<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 4a33fedf-9188-33a2-ba1e-3ba21a949497> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,there are more and more digital products in this world.For example,mobile phone is
everywhere.We usually use our mobile phone to communicate with others even if they are far
away from you.
Digital products have so many effects on every aspect about people's lives.For instance,
if we have a MP4,we can watch a movie or listen favourite songs no matter where we are.Take my
experience for example,when I take a bus,I always listen songs with my MP4 so that I can spend
time on the bus.
As far as I am concerned,digital products have advantages and disadvantages.On the one hand,
digital products are very convenient and they can help us finish something efficiently.On the
other hand,digital products may not be safe because they can easily reveal our privacy to others.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID cac98958-38c0-3479-bd98-c552dea1ccaa> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
In the modern society, our daily lives are filled with more and more ditital productions. Such as computer, mobilephone, mp3, mp4, PSP and so on. They have already changed our lives in every ascept.
When I was just a little boy, there were not so many digital productions. My childhood was spent in the field, it was quite funny. But nowadays, children even haven't seen the field or corps, especially who were borned after 2000. Everyday, they spend lots of time in playing computer games, playing PSP or using mobilephone, few of them will go outdoors and play with each other or do some exercises.The digital productions has killed their childhood.
The adults are the major users of digital productions. Chaping by mobilephone, listening  music or seeing films by mp4, playing games by computer has become a part of their daily lives. If the digital productions disappear suddently, most of them may feel despondent and become crazy.Because the digital productions have made great influence in our lives, we can't leave it now.
In my opinion, if we can make good use of these digital productions with a diet, it can benefit us a lot. We can't relay it too much.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID b5f1190c-7ab4-3d95-917e-43b0aa6c96d6> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, there're more and more digital products appear to our life. People are increasingly inseparable from the electronic products. There're so many digital products in our life such as digital camera, digital computer, digital television, and so on, which grow in an increasing categories and quantities. Believe it or not, look around yourself and you can easily find one or two of these stuffs.
And what kind of influence does so many digital products bring to us? The answer is surely .The digital bring us big convinces to our daily life. For example, digital camera help us record our life easily with the digital camera, we can choice the right photo, which was impossible with the traditional camera. In another hand, digital products change the shopping way, people shopping on line buy digital computer more often. But on the contrary, digital products also have some not good, people chat by QQ or other way, which lead to them quick the real life.
In my opinions, we might as well initiatively avoid some of them despite efficiency and comfort they can supply. Don’t forget those old days when you were going to visit an old school friend though there would be a long train journey, which, in today’s digital era, has been thoroughly replaced by the digital on-line chatting.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID b7da7743-dd7a-335a-a25d-f515f953af55> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With time goes,the development of techlogy has improved our life and make the people do some work more and more easier.Nowadays more and more digital products which have went in to our life ,play an important role.There are all kinds of digetal products in our society such as computer,Mp3,mobilephone and so on.
With the digital products appear,the people get great benifits and take less time to do the same things than before.For example,people often search some informations in the Internet by computer.Futhermore, people also communicate with each other by mobilephone,which make our life more corlorful.There is no denying that the digital products  bring us so much advantages,but the digital products have an effect on our life.Some student are additied to comouter games so that they don't want to study.
As far as I am concerted,the digital products are good for our life.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 0b40b733-43df-3498-b55f-c35c09826b8f> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many digital age around our life.Such as:telephone,electronic watch,MP3,MP4,PSP and so on.They all connect with our life.
When we have telephone,we can talk with our relatives wherever we stay.In the old time,if we want to talk with somebody,we should go to his house.But now we never.When we have MP3,we can listen the song without bringing a big machine.When we have a lap,we can work in everywhere...They all convenient us.
However,we also get some trouble by using them.Many people play games out of control.Someone phone the other when they in 200m...The digital age also make me lazy.
In my opinion,the digital age is a good thing.If we use them in our control,they can help us.But without control,they can destroy us.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 463c7abc-ee38-37dd-89b1-cad454452d37> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,as we all know, is the digital age. People watch TV at home, tall to others on phone, get in touch with friends by Internet, or play games with computer...All of these are telling us that we live in a digital products world. And as time going by, there will be more and more new digital products coming out.
Maybe you will ask that why are there so many digital products in our llife? Yeah,the answer is: we need it. In fact, the digital products really help us a lot. The TV make many family get together, the mobile phone help a lot on people's relationship.
In my opinion, digital products, like everything else, have both favorable and unfavorable aspects. Whatever effects they have, one thing is certain: digital products in themselves are neither good nor bad. Nowaday is the digital age.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 07d2ed2b-804a-304c-935d-6daea9c7451c> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,with the developement of technology,digital product is becoming more and more universal popular.I still remember that,when I was young,having a mobile phone is proudly thing,but now, even a primary school student can have a mobile phone.
We can't deny that some digital product is amazing ,such as iphone.You can not imagine how powerful it is .With the most advant system ,iphone can run many program at the same time.It make our life more easier and chage our life in many way such as reading、traveling、commerce、entertainment and so on.
In this digital age,digital change their generation nearly every two years. Some people pursuit the most advanced product and give up their old one,this is a kind of wasting.I hope our new producted digital product can be  advanced to the higher class by changing core element and serve people in a better way.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 79f3d437-1727-3186-bd4c-4e4989b683a2> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of our society,people have more and more needs.Because of people's needs,scientists try their best to invent digital products .Nowadays,more and more digital invention has been invented for human beings' life.These products make our life convenient and colorful.The digital age is coming.
As a coin has two sides, technology has its advantages and disadvanges.The digital products influence our life on many sides.Nobody can neglect the fact that our living conditions have been improved due to digital inventions.Because of the digital products, we can save time and people have more free time.Such as telephone, we can talk with others and transmit informations quickly.But the other side of the coin has become already visible. The digital products has some bad influence on nature if we can't make good use of them.
In my opinion,the digital is good for our life. We must make good use of them on good purpose.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID dd37011c-c287-3ce3-af1c-127d011e312d> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,more and more advent eletronic come to our life.Such as telephone,MP3,PC and so on.Sometimes they realy improve our life quality, but sometimes,they realy good to us?
Fomer days,it is difficult for us communication when wo are not in the same place.But telephone change it.It take so many conveniences to our life that we can take,wo can transfer information anytime,anywhere.As same as computure,we can use it to gain the information we need,watch news of anywhere of the world. What's,more some automates systens improve the process of product.They realy make our life become more and more sofe.
But, at the same time ,when we are amazed at the technology of today,we must think that they realy make our life more happiness? They don't. They make our distance of heart become far away.They make us far away nature,and just stay at home watch TV.
So we need wo go out to feel the nature rather than watch TV or computer.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 1ad99632-60c0-3ed4-b067-a1776dbda132> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowaday,there are more and more electrical products servel for us.Such as the TV,fridge,computer and mobile phone.Most of them are use for making us live more comfortable.
The electrical products had infected our life in many ares.For example,If we want to connect with others,we have to write letter or meet the others in the past.But now,we just use the mobile phone can achieve this goal.
To be honest,these products making our world more and more small and saving us more time.
In mine opinion of the electrical products,I think this may have two side.While we using the products,we may attracticed by the product.Such as the psp and computer.This products was made for fun and attracting you.If we can not control ourselves we may lose our mind in them.So,although the products are good for our daily life,we still have to warring us that the we are the man and we have to control ourselves not the products

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 6c1a4fa9-a475-3f77-8849-8b0ad7dda4b9> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,the digtal age had became ong part of our life.For excemple nearly all of ous have the phone.Sometimes we may use it to tall with ous friends,play games or search the internet.And the televisiom is also an important digial age for us.We use it to know the news happen everyday.Therefore,we can say that the digital age changs our life and give ous a lot of convenient.It may be a terrfying thang that if we lost all the digital age.
However,while the digital age is making ove live,it brings many problem to ous,as well.Because of having the digital age,many people may use more time stead at home instead of going out for sport or meeting friends face to face.
Therefore,in my opinion,the digital age is a very good things for us,but we must use it in a right way.Only in this way can the digital age turally inprove our life.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 8ea0a860-d01d-3c20-a265-643dffd1cc6e> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowaday,as we known,we make use of more and more electronic products in our daily life.such as computer,mobelphone,MP4 and so on.
Electronic products is very good for us.Nowaday,we can buy more what is we need and find out news that had hapened all around the word in our house by computer and internet.If we have a tour,we can take some photograph by digital camera.If we drive a car to a unfamiliar city,we do not to worry about that we will lose,because we can make use of car navigation system.So our daily life will more convenient by make use of electronic product.
In my opinion,I think that more and more electronic products will make good to us.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 996ed21a-21d9-3dd4-9572-a435187a3a70> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,there are more and more digital products in our dialy life.For example,the mobile phones,the computers,the carmeras and so on.They do benefict our activities.
Not only have the digital products been in our dialy life,but also have an imapat
on our work.When we want to connect somebody,we just need to take out our phones and then make a call to him.When we go to somewhere interests and we want to remember this moment,we just need to take a carmera and then take photos. When we happen to something hard to solve,we can open the computer and search the internet for some imformation.What is more,after a whole day work,we can watch TV,lisen songs and other ways to realex our tired bodys.
As far as I am concerned,the digital products have been one part in our modern life.Only if we make good use of the digital products,they will benefict our life a lot.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID e551c74f-e9d1-344e-8aed-28e2d67ed39e> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
The rensent years,electronic products have become more and more.They have been used in all kinds of places.We can't live out of them.And they became the topic our lives.
Of course,the electronic products have given us the more beautiful lives.For example,electronic products make us known more news which are happening all the world and get us talk about with our families and friends so easy and convenient.And electronic products also make our work became more simple and succeed in them.What's more,electronic products let our world become much smaller.So,our lives has appeared great changes and big influence.
I think that electronic products will develop more and more quickly.And they also take much bigger changes to us.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID a9e0525e-3ff3-3123-906b-ffeaea570777> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, with the development of the technology, more and more digital ages are invented by people, such as television、telephone、computer、video and so on.
There is no doubt that the digital age will have a great effect in our life. For example, we can know lots of information like the news about what happen in the world in television, besides that we can also use the computer to buy something what we want online like new clothes、food or other things without going out to the market. So, we can the digital age are surely bring us benefit and convenience.
In my opinion, Not only benefit and convenience the digital age bring us but also an bad effect in our life the digital age bring us.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 87e60677-aec1-358d-91f8-13f1e34e05c2> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,as we all know,the number of electrical productions that is around us is
increasing fast,such as mobilephone,computer,washing machine and so on.
We seems to use electrical productions almost everyday,in other words,the eletrical
productions make a great difference in many pact of our lives.For example,we often use mobilephone and computer to communicate with others and acquire acknowledge and achieve informations.And we wash our clothes through a washing machine at home.
As far as I am concerned,the production is a coin with two points.On one hand,it is so convinient for us to communicate,learning,shopping and working that we have improved our lives' quality.On the other hand,however,it may make us become lazy and knowless if we rely too much on it.In a word,we only can take it for a tool that we can use, not a company who we can rely on.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 768a23b3-be87-3c8e-b82c-510c4024ab8d> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,because of the developing of the teachnology,the electronic products enrich
our life,and we can see the electronic products surrounds us.In fact,the electronic products play an importants role in our daily life.It make our daily life more convinience.Fist of all,in the way of communication,we can use mobile phone to communicate with each other rather than write the letter,it more convinience for us,and the effect of the communication is also improve a lot.Secondly,in the way of listen music or watching movie ,we can use the mp4 and so on to help us,whithout the limit by the surrounding,we can listing or watching what we like to enjoy our life.In a word,the electronic products can help us to enjoy our life.On the orther hand,it also bring some troubles to our daily life, such as the eletronic garbage which can't recycle,and influence the enviorment,this is the biggest problem.What's more,it also has the radiation which affect the people's healthy.
In my opinion,with the development of the technology,our scientist can solute the problem such as use the specical materials and so on！

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 3aeb85ca-1d1f-3b22-8923-ba0ecfe1c465> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Thanks to the rapid development of technology,nowaday,
humam being are living in a Digatal Age.
Almost product around us with Digatal, computer cellphone,
camera and even TV,washing mechine,microwave,are designed
with Digatal.And all of those thing bring much convinence to us.
It seems that that the moden life could not withoutDigital.
if oneday  my cellphone and computer were broke dowm,I will
feel isolating from the word.and it's so terible!
However,although the Digital product seem to be wonderfull
it make people lazy,like the Digital washing mechine,it make
people far from the enjoyment in washing clothes by hand. and
all theDigital puduct work with radition,and it harm.
So we should use Digital product limited.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 03618437-c96e-316d-a282-ea2aa6cb43b4> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the increasing development of the economy,the number of digital products increases in a high speed.Gradualy, digital products play an important role in modern people's life.
Digital products influent the human society a lot.Take mobile phone as an example,it's mobile phone that changes the way of communication.Messages and phone calls take up the biggest part of communication.
As the symbol of the digital age,computer is a necessity of people 's life.Work,entertainment and even study can not conduct without computers.It seems that computer would control human one day,but we just can not live without computer.
As the saying goes,every coin has two sides.On the one hand,digital products take up a big part in our life,which makes people have  less time to communicate with each other.Also,virtual world may do harm to people.On the other hand,digital products do help people a lot.They makes people communicate easier.What 's more,the world become more beautiful because of them.
So,it's necessary for us to use digital products properly.Only in this way,can the world become more beautiful.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 00b43f5c-f20d-3236-a429-5e22a3faed93> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, more and more electronic machine had been produced. No one can live a life without them. In addition, high quality technology provide us a more conveniently and better life.
For the example, the telephone called “iphone” has changed our life more. Not only can it used to conmunicate with you families or friends, but also you can make it a game machine. There is no doubt that "iphone" is not just a telephone . It is a micro-computer at all.
In my opinions, electronic productions play a more and more important role in our life. They help us save our time and release many work of us. However, to much electronic productions will reduce our skill of ourselves. We may became very lazy after the life full of digital productions. Besides, a lot of interesting things must lost from our life. So, boring will be a biggest worry in the life last.
In a word, electronic productions benefit us a lot as well as making us lost a lot. As the saying goes, every coin has two sides. Using them in a balanced way is the most important thing we should do.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID a44e66a2-8102-3194-b4ee-9025a6ae95bd> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, more and more digital products come to our life and it makes our life much more convenience. We can't leave them now.
Mobile phone, computer, two of the most well-known digital products were used by every family. Almost everyone has used them and almost everyone can't leave them. Mobile phone, which makes the communication convenience, has become an important part of our life. One day, if you go to work or go to school, you find that your mobile phone was at home, you will go back home to take it surly. Or one day, you must work without computer, you will find that your work become harder.
In my opinion, digital products certainly make our life convenience, but we depend on them too much. IF one day, all digital product disappear, you will fill that the world becomes worse and make you can't alive. So, although the digital products make our life convenience and it can be get easily. But we must adapt to the life without digital products.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 6303dd41-125e-385f-8ee5-e21ec4239a22> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of our life,more and more digital things become a part of our life.Nowadays,without that digital things,we will meet a lot of problem.
In our daylife,digital things can be seen everywhere,study，work,entertaintemt and so on.It bring lots of convenient for our life,with that things, people can make the live and work more convenient.
However,everything has two sides.The digital things not only bring the conveniences to ourlife, but also cause many serious problems.One of the problems is that most of the digital things will be harm for our health, especially the childs.It result in many serious illness,which we still can't deal with now. Besides,people more and more depend on the digital things ,so they are short of partice.
As far as I'm concern,digital life is a porgress of man ,it is convenient for our life, but we should't too depend on it,we should think it as a skill,but more inportant is our partice.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 854af762-0259-3bb4-98fc-ea037a55dcc2> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As everyboby knows,there various of electronic products in morden society.For
example,people using societical network to communicate with eachother everywhere.
Just like every coin has two side.Eletronic
products has both advantages and disadvantages.On the one hand,it made our life
more convenient.For instanse,Online shopping
save a lot time of buying things.Moreover,
electronic products helps to do some difficult problem and improve the technology.
On the other hand,it cause electronic waste
and made our evesight weaker and weaker.Further more,some students use it to cheat in the test.
As far as I am concerned,modern people can not live without electronic products.But
we  can control the using time to protect pur eyes.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 6ba7c7b3-8b05-3a2e-a184-49cfe7409bf1> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the technology developing rapidly,there are more and more electronic product appearing our surrounding .In every field of mordern society,they are playing a vital role and expect our the style of our life.
If you want to have a talk with your lover,unfortunately,the long distance prevent your meeting,in this situation,the digital mobile phone can help you have a face time wherever you are . If you want to spend a night enjoying your favourite film in such relaxing weekend but not go to movie theatre .you can use a mobile media player such as itouch to satify your desire even in your sofa.
Nobody  can avoid the impact in the digitat age ,so cann't I.
I have mang electeonic prouct including the digital camera ,the mobile meida palyer,the PSP and so on.After using the iphone ,I overturn my concept fron traditonnal phone.Every coin have both sides,In the same time,the electornic product uncover the ugly of our character,we are becoming more lazy and greedy even lose our heart.We have to be a host or a controler avoding to be a slave in this digital age.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 546055cd-9ae1-3cba-a2e3-07a5ae5c4e73> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Today there are  so  many  digital age.The  digital age has a lot  of  impacts on our daily life.There are mang digital age so as computer telephone the TV and so on.
The opositive of the digital age on our life like that the computer let us know the news at the first time.The  computer can help us do mang work.The telephone can let us talk with  each other at anywhere .It can help you know what happen on your family at the first.The TV let us know what happen at the world angwhere.
The negative of the digital age on our life like that some children play the computer games on the internet all the time.That is bad for the children on study.They spend so much on the internet reslut that they lose theirselve on the internet.And some children watch the TV all the day that is bad for their eyes.
So there are two side on our life .We should use the opositive of the digital age and avido the negative of the digital age.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID fc387e6b-a477-392e-bb00-b95b1f25474f> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
There are more and more electronic products during the economic development.We are into the digitl age No one can live without the electronic products in the modren world as water to flish.
Mobilephone is a good example.No matter you are a student teacher woker you will have a moilephone all the time excet you are shouwer.If your mobilephone is missing,you will upst and don't konow how to do.
The electronic products give us much convienint.We can know everything happen around the world
in the first time and we can learn everthing we want in home.Thanks to the electronic products we
have a more time to learn and play because we need't do everthing by ourselves.So the wold development more and more fast.
But every coin have two side.MOre and more teenage addiction in eletronic produsts.They play computer and mobilephone all day and all night even not eat and sleep.It make many parents sad.
People became lazy for computer can help them do many thing.
We are in digital age.We should make good use of the electronic products but not addict to them.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 8c10e9cd-8331-31f1-8b74-4c1bd3d28d88> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,there's more and more digital products used in our daily life.As we all know,as the technology development is growing faster and faster,the products are updated quicker and quicker.
As far as I can see,the digital products have been used in our life,works,entertainment and so on.We can hardly leave them even in one second.For example,most of us use cellphone everyday to send texts,contact someone or go to website,etc. and with the more functions come to be used in the same machine,the more dependence we have.
In my opinion,evey coin has two sides.Though we live with the digital which can make us know huge of things all over the world anywhere,it also make some people overdepend on them,which seem they have had drugs.What's more,the digitals can let us communication without face to face and search more what's we don't kown online faster,but it means that it would weak our social communication skill and even we would lose our privercy.All in all,we should use it in a banlance way,don't overdepend on them.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID cd5aebe0-c773-3933-a624-6832dc15cc97> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As rapid development of technology,our life is surrounded the digital devices.Some       people even regard the digital devices as daily necessities.
AS we all known,we are living in the digital age,and digital device is playing an          important role in anywhere of our life.You may talking with your friend when you walking     in the garden，or you can surfering in the Internet while you listening to the music       through your PC,and so on.
It's no doubt that digital devices have improved our life and making our word             become more wonderful.Because people can finish their work more faster and relaxer by        some digital device;when we stay at home,we also can know more and more information          through  TV、computer or your iphone4s.However,the digital devices also have a             downside.Lots of people depend on their digital devices and become more and more          lazier.The industrial wastes of producting the digital devices also do harm to our           nature.
For me,I do agree with the development of digital devices,but we also should protect    our nature while producting the digital devices,only in this way can we enjoy the digital    age.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 095bad66-cecf-3422-b9af-80cf79baf682> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
nowadays,more and more digital prodution come into our life.such as mobil phone,digital camera ,computer,etc.because technology advance,electronic products will be more and more cheaper which means more people in the possession of electronic products.
It's no doubt that the electronic products change our life a lot,it's impact happen in the Various aspects of our life.we use digital camera to take photos or use mobil phone to talk with others.cause the electronic products develop rapidly,which leads to the way we get information chang a lot.we know what happen in the world in the first time,and it save our time.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID e5e7a32f-e6e6-3dd0-9212-555c45a38355> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,our society is filled with the digital products which are becoming more and more important to us.So,we can see,today is a digital age.
As we know,the digital products have been an important part in our lives.Every sides in our lives are influenced by their developments.For example,the mobile phone can makes us keeing in touch with each other easily,the game products as ps2,ps3 and psp make our lives full of joy,and the mp3,mp4 make us relax and be comfortable,etc.
However,in my opinion,they make our lives more and more comfortale and easer,but they still have something bad to our lives.The mobile phone can weak our people's realation,and we may be addicted to the game and so on.So,we should know everything has its two sides,we should use their good parts.What we should do is we should learn how to control them and not they control us.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 713f0d38-067d-3470-a02b-ccb3272c244e> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the development of the science and technology, we can see more and more digital products come to our life, play a very important role.
To most people of us, no doubt have experienced these ourselves in our own life for the development of the digital products. They make more and more influences around our life. First, they make our life become very convenient, effective and colorful. With the television, we can know things all over the world in our house; with the washing-machine, cooking-machine, even robot came to our life, we can just sit and wait lots of things be quickly done. And with the computer, of course, it change our life a lot.  Such as working, shopping, learning, entertaining and so on, we can’t imagine what our life would be like without computer.
But with these digital products, we become more and more lazy, we become less and less take to our friends face to face. We become more and more rely on them.
So, I believe, only have a good use can we make process  with these products!

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 4ea478a2-4938-3f2b-906f-458f900e7220> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,as the improvment of technology ,the digital produce become
more and more ,also the price pf that become cheaper and cheaper.And many digital things aroud us have become the necessatise.
So that the digital things have great affect on our daily life,such as
education, entainment,comnunication and so on.
As far as i am concerned, the digital things would become an important
role in our daliy life, beside, they would make people more convieniant in some places.In the contratly,the digital things have bad affect on people like ray,short-sight,poor in connunication.In short,ervey coion
have two sides. Even if many bad affect from digital things,the digital age would come soon and the advantige more than the short.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 012169ce-470b-3d15-b0bc-53873c5efb53> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
In nowdays technology has developed so fast,so there are so many digital product in our life.These digital product has so many ability to help us finish the things that never been done before,so people very like them.
Some times it becomes a fashional thing to have some digital product.People are happy to own something like camera,computer and cellphone.There si no doubts that these things make our life more convenient and wonderful.And it is necessary to have them in our age,sometimes when you lost them,you will be in trouble.
But it is not very good to spend so much time and energy in these digital product.Because it will make us involved in it and waste much time to work and study.That wound not be so good,so if you have them,please make most use about them and don't be a slave to them.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 634a8dd3-2ccd-38df-8d3c-cc98a58040b0> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of the technology,we are now covered with digital goods. No matter what you think, we have come to the digital age.There are so many digital products in our daily life, including the televesion,camera,microwave,computer and so on.
The digital products affect a lot in our life. On the one hand, they improve the quality of our lives. For instance, we can use camera to take photos with our family or friends and
sent them to the computer or Internet share your happyness with others.
On the other hand,of course the negative effect is obvious, too. Take computer as an example. Nowadays, many teenagers are addicted to computer games and rusty of their studies. Also, some people use computer to commit crimes.
So every coin has two sides. When we enjoy the benefits of digital products, we should also pay attention to reduce the negative influence.And then, the society will be more
harmony and the life of people will be more comfortable.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 21834ff5-bc1d-394f-b91e-852ffde9c36b> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Not doubt that you have used the digital products. And the kinds of digital products are various now and increasingly rise as time goes.
Why are they accepted so extensively?Because human bings benefit from them.It's computers that reduce the distance of people's heart and in which we can gain lots of knowlege .Also we are easy to make a convesation because of mobile phones .Digital products keep the world moving.
In my opinion,we can't live without digital products.They have been playing an important role in our daily life.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 6ee59741-36db-3c2a-ad8c-b857f3dfd459> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, the digical product is becoming more and more popular,which became what we need for all people.The digital product is benefitial to our life,which is the product of the age.
The importance of the digital thing has not to ignore ,whose effect is great and unbelievable. You can see the digital product wherever you are in your life.There are many digital products,such as mobile phone,computer,match and so on. These change gave us unbelievable convenience,only at home you can get what  you want.Only a short time you can do everything that you need.Nowadays,our life is more interest,because of that.
In my konwledge,I don't konw more about the digital product,but I used it for a long time in my life.I think it will give us many benefits.I believe it and I use it.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID e854660c-2dd4-3731-9551-643e803d2145> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowaday more and more digital product in our lives . The increasing digital products change people's ways of lives and play the important part in it . People rely on the advanced digital product to make the lives more easier and more effieve .
In my opinion , the digital product become more advanced is benifit to us , just like automatic systeam , wo can use mang thing by oursleves and must not rely on other people , then the advanced digital make us to cummunicate easier . But on the other part of the coin , the
advanced digital product make some people lazier than before , mang people rely it to become solitary .

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 338a5763-0e39-3fc2-ada4-89e3d825862b> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays the quality and quantity of electrical products is more better than before.As we kown,for example,the TV sets and MP3 is become a part of our life.
How do the electrical products affects our life?It's no doubt that it improve our busy life and it help us doing things conviniently.When we want to get some information around the world,we can watch the TV or surfing Internet.While we cooking,we can use the automatic products to direct the time and temperature.The effects of it is everything.
The electrical products also improve my life.It takes me enjoy the modern life.I can chat with my friend and listening the wonderful song.Actually,I learning about how to design an electrical product and improve it more efficient.I love the digital one so much,but I still like reading in paper book but not e-book.Because I thing that the traditional reading way is the root of my life.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 5604c5b4-0bb6-3826-a2a6-6be8b4d0321b> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowaday,with the development of electronic technology,there are more and more electronic products are consumed.Such as mobile phone ,MP3,mp4,computer,pad and so on .It make an important role today and make an deep influene in people's life .
As we all know ,electronic products bring us many comvenience .Just like telephone make one comunicate with other so easy .Or like the computer help us a lot. With the computer and iternet ,you can do many things without to get outside.Wilh a MP3 ,you can enjoy music everytime and everywhere .Hower ,at the same time ,it bring us some disdvntages.For exmple,phone also hurt people'body by radiation .
In my opinion ,electronic technology can change our life . Make our life more wonderful.If you make good use of it ,you can get a lot of conveniences and enjoy a lot .

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 8a831349-3890-3cbf-977e-a12690fae55f> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of digital technology and science more and more new digital products provide us new function that make us more convenient and more comfortable.
There is no deying that digital products play an important role in our life .For example ,at the moment I am using the computer to write this text and computer can be use to deal with complex math proplem which people can't do it in a limited time.Furthemore ,digital products have trans our triditional way of conversation.It pulls us into a more close distance.However ,it the old digital products also pullte the invirinment .
In my opinion,digital products is indispensibla for us in a moder society.But what we should not neglect is that we should try best to find new way to reduce pulleition.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 137cb539-d444-3d94-abcb-163b6a354069> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the development of technology and science, there are more and more electrical products which are convenient and usful for our human beings. For example, the computer,the mobil phone, the various machines and so on.
These products absolutely have an importment effect on our life. we can save time by improve the effectivity if we use the correct machines exactly. The light make our night more lively than what our ancestors do because they have nothing to do without the light.In another hand,we can change many principles which is hard in the past and thus make our life in the way we like.
But there are some bad things we do not want to deal with which is the inplution caused by our carelessness. It will cause a diseaster if we still take it for grant and do nothing with it.
So, I want to say that it is our right to develop the advanced to insure our life quality but also it is our duty to make efforts to avoid the damage. Just as like the coin,every thing has two sides, and we should pursure the most profit.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID fe705582-0dca-3204-9fdb-c5bda37608e8> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowsday as our science technology becomes more and more advance,the digital
products have flooded into our life,such as ipad,MP5,personal computer iphone and
so on.
The digital products have an influnce impact on our daily life.For instance,
if we want to call and see our friend who studys far away from you ,we can use 3G
phone or our computer to talk and chat with them.It is very happy!Through them,we
can have many choices to convey our emotions.Not only does they affect our
friendships,but also they can influnce our thinking.Years ago we often crowded
into people to shop,it is very trouble.However we can find another convenient way
to shop,namely shop online,before we go shopping.
Just as the old saying goer,every coin has two sides.What the digital
products bring about not just is positive,but also negetive.On the one hand they                  make us become lazy and foolish.On the other hand,as we human need more matial to
produce them,before we enjoy the convenient, we human have destroyed the earth!

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 7c7dfd3f-8d17-33bf-8535-f6807cddb85a> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
It's the digital age that what we live in is.There are a wide of variety electronic products in our life.
As we all known, we can live without the electronic products.For the one thing, thanks to the electronic products, we live in a convenient age,which massages are powerful.We can find out what we need in the internet and can konw what happen in our life. For another,we live in the advanced age. Because of the accurate electronic products, we can make our science technology more accurate then can product the perfect product.
As far as I'm concerned, the influence of the electronic products can devided into two. It's not doubt that we live in a convenient age. But as for the electronic products make us can't live without it, we become lock of the independence. And we become more indifferent. Therefore, we shouldn't take it for grant that the digital age always great, we must live in ourselves.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID ec6bb3c8-9aa0-3dca-858a-3c3af64fdb3f> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the science developing,more and more electronic products are  used more and more widely in our day life.Many people can buy them.
The  electronic products play an important role in our life.The computers can help do many things,both working and entertainment.we can know many things on the Internet.Such as news,some knowledges.So once we see something we don't know,we will searching the Internet first.The washing machine can help us washing the clothes ,so we don't wash many clothes every day.
In my opinion,the use of electronic products have both advantages and disadvantages.We must know hou to use it in a good way.It can bring us many convince.But if you use it in an unproper way,it will bring some disadvantage to you.such as play computer game.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 9dbe8ec0-f081-3c50-b2b9-feb564cf8c7f> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,more and more Digital products appear in ourlife.When take photo,We use digital camera; we listen misic by MP3 or MP4; we use computer to work and paly;and the kids play radiocontrolled car......We have gone into a Digital Age.
As the digital products increasing,our life turn to be more conveninet.For example,the GPS navigation can quicklly point out the road;the telephoto make us communicte more easily;and  the microwave oven can make food easily.In a word,it made a big influence in our life!
Even thought the digital products also have many disadvantage. I believe more digital products will be created in the future, and they will continue to have a great impact on our life, study and work.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 43f6e691-813d-3575-8357-ed91c01388ed> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays ,becanse of the development of technology ,more and more digital products are invented.Such as mobilphone,conmputer,etc.These digital products have a great influence on every aspect of people's daily life.For eaxmple,the invention of mobilphone makes us more cenvenient to communicate with others,which we can call others at any moment.But ,as the coin has two sides,they also bring something bad things for us.Bacause of the internet,our intimity is easier stolen by others.
In my opinions,those digital products are good for us if we use them exactly.the bad aspect which they bring are someone not use them illegally.So,if everyone use them legally,they will make our life become colourfully.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 2504aa14-7c1f-3ed4-846b-61fac1b15c30> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,the digital products are used in many fields in our daily life.For example,a lot of people own their mobile phone and computer.The digital products are popular andcan be seen everywhere in our lives.
The digital products have great influence on us because it provides us with convenience and entertainment.If you have a computer,you can learn knowledge on Internet and search for much information. If you own a mobile phone,you can communicate with others all the time.But at the same time,the digital products make people lazy.With the help of the digital products,people do not need to be considerate so that they become careless.
In my opinion,we take great advantages from the digital products.They make our life easier but we should not rely on them too much.For example,We should get in touch with the society by ourselves,not the Internet.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 56ebfd8c-2e6a-3853-8656-c50cece1dc48> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays , more and more digital products appear in our daily life .
There is no doubt that those digitai products are making a great diference in all aspects to our life . Take mobilephone as an example . Because of its existense ,we are able to communicate with others more comvenient , what'more , it provide us lots of software to use , which could help us a lot . Of couse ,besides mobilephone , there's lots of digital products , such as watch , calculator and so on .
From my standpoint , digitai products have made some positive effect on our life . It make our life more comfortable and effective . But there's no denying that digital products have its own disadvantage . As you know , it could help peole to do a lot , which may stop people  to develop their creativity . What's worse ,it may do damage to our health bacause of its X-ray .

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID ac6e8046-ef30-3929-b1d1-f7a307483cab> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays，more and more digital produces come out our life.Digital camera，mobile phone ，MP3，MP4，MP5，PSP，PDA，online ebook，and Digital Products &Services: Including laptop computer, network computer, smart card system and machine, LED display system, etc.
Speaking of digital wares, I bought a digital camera last week.As a active student，i live take photos very much. With a digital camera，i can take down some pretty pictures in my life.
However，the greatest impact for digital produces is making our life more Convenient and simple.Mobile phone，like iPhone 4s,i think everybody want to buy one.for waht?nothing but its magic fuction.
The use of digital product for people to work, study and live a great influence. in his work, the digital products made more convenient and working conditions, our work efficiency greatly improved. in our studies, we can use remote computer instruction. but we can be downloaded from the internet all sorts of useful information. the study and many digital products to our lives more comfortable and varied.
Generally speaking, the digital product for we have produced great impression that our living quality of our learning is more convenient, it is our work easier.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID f9802d33-0bb9-395e-9e99-24ad75ae8be0> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,there were many digital production in our life.Just
like TV,mobliephone and computer,so on.Those things have made
a huge effect to our life,it made our life more comfortable and
beautiful.
The digital production has effect many ereas of our dialy life.
If we want to go to work,we can drive car.And when we want to talk
to someone,just use the mobilephone in your pocket.After the work,we
also can open TV to watch a film or open the computer to play games.
The digital age is a funny and perfect age.
In my eyes,I don't like to use the digital production all the time.
Beacause it made us less to talk to the friends beside,or it just made
us stay in home all the day.In the digital age,childrens don't know how
to plant trees or how beatiful the animals they are.The digital production
also control our life.
All in all,when we use our mobliephone,don't forget we also can talk
to our friends face in face.When we play computer games,we also can play
with the classmates.The digital age also must be a friendship age,too.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 5e3483c2-0282-394e-9b4d-5bb717cc9360> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,more and more electronic productions are invented.At the same time,with the development of technology,this productions are more and more intelligent.They can make our lives much more comfortabel.In others words,elecronic productions have a huge influence to our lives.With thisproductions,something that hard to do before can be finished easily right now.For example,IPhone is only a small mobile phone,however,it is the phone that can help us to control our house.
In my opinions,this electronic productions are incredible inventions and I like it deeply.For one thing,we can solve problems more convenient with this productions.For another,the creative inventions can make the impossible possible.Last but not the least,with this productions,a more colorful word is showing to us.In a word,I have falled in love with the digital age.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 8b98d5ab-f5f4-3794-9875-cc8b0fcac526> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, more and more digital age was appeared in our life.such as the ridio,the telephone,the computer and so on.
So we use the digiral ages in our day to day life,and it have maken great infection of us.For example,when we have a telephone,wherever we are ,we can keep in touch with our families and our friends.when we have a computer,we can know what happened in all the world.Without doubt,the digital ages make our life to be more and more wouderful and now we are hardly to live without them.
In my opinion,although the digital ages make our life to be greatful,we can't make our life to be controled by them.Now,more and more people,especailly the child and the teenage,are lose themselves in the computer games.And the people are prefer to stay at home rather than go out.It would make human more and more lonely and unhealthy.So,we should use the digital ages in the limited time and usually go out to meet our friends and play games with them.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID a37caa31-5508-3fdd-bc6d-806cfaf107c3> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
More and more digital productions to be used in our dairy life, it plays an importance part in all aspacts of our life . We can use it to chat with eath other or to see something on line, even to buy my food by means of using the digital production , in a word ,we cann't break away from the digital .As somebady saying "we must have there things
,living,die,digital productions." It can prove the improtance of the digital productions.
From my point of view , the digital productions are helpful ,but as the saying goes, every coin has two sides,we should avoid its flaw but make good use of strength.We should not allow it to be used in the harmful aspact. The digital production is updated very quicky,helpful or harmful , I cann't judge ,just time knows.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID b54ecc41-918f-3e40-bc9b-2622299d18be> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
There is no doubt that 21st century is the digital age.More and more digital products blend into our diary lives such as i-pad,i-pod,i-tune or any other brands not only just APPLE.
Obviously,digital products mean so much to us and they have many advantages nowadays.It's digital thing that richs our lives and makes us more entertainment.We can use a note book to watch movies,listen to music,check e-mails and read news,which can't be imagined in the past.What's more,teenagers' curiosity and creativity are easy to be motivated when they touch the screen and research the structure of a digital camera.Digital Age is unable to be obstruct because it's a result of humanity's progress.
But every coin has two side.Digital products do make some problems to us and they affect us silently.Nowadays,you can see many people helding an i-pione in the street and some of them may be addicted to the APPLE,which is famous for it's prefection.In fact,we are becoming the people who are pursuing brands and luxury and digital products make us crazy.A student or who are addicted to them are easy to be relax in their study because digital things do have many interests.So with the development of digital things,problems are increasing.
Digital Age are coming and what we should do is to treat them with a peaceful mind.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID a14c63fb-4586-39ba-bdc0-d2b600a8bd5c> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,more and more digital products were made to help us work and  live.So,it is the fact that it makes a great diffrence on humans'life in  all kinds of ways.In my opinion,the digital products can make things more conveniently to go on.Because of them,people can work easilier.At the same time,our society can not have great improvement without the advanced digital products.However,evrything has two sides,digital products would make people get in trouble.For example,the kids might become crazy about the computer games which is based on the digital products.
In a word,we can make the digital products do more good to us,as long as all of us take good use of them.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 539f41de-3844-37d1-821f-f63866ce5cc1> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Today,the digial products are more ang more general.For example,computer,telphone,moble phone,camera and so on.
In my opinion,the digital products have a different advantage and a  disadvantage deal with how people use them.Such as computer,on one hand,peoplec can use it to know some news they do not know or buy some thing,Student can use it study English or other subjects.Beyond that,a country economy also can not be better without computer.
But on the other hand,some people play computer games so that they can not do their work well,students can not stduy be absorbed.This is a  very bad way to use computer.I think people can relax by computer games but should not wallow computer games.
A digital product is useful or not,it deal with that how people use it.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 7477450f-c74d-3987-a37e-7a10a3893096> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, digital products, such as computers, digital TVs, digital cameras, MP3 players and MP4 players, are widely used. With the development of information technology, these products are making rapid progress.
The digital products have a great effect on people’s work, study and life. With the computers, our work becomes much easier than before. Some work that used to be performed outdoors can now be done in the comfort of an office. As for us students, these digital products help a lot in our studies. For instance, we can improve our English listening ability with the help of an MP3 or MP4 player. It’s very convenient to carry these gadgets around and listen to English wherever and whenever we want.
In the way of entertainment, digital TVs and cameras can make our life more colorful and meaningful. With a digital camera, we can take pictures of every memorable moment.
Our society has entered a digital age. I believe more digital products will be created in the future, and they will continue to have a great impact on our life, study and work

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID f4b1993b-fa78-384f-915f-2d73d9fd7fa3> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Today in our house,the digital productions sournd by our house,and we are in a age which we can't live without digital productions.
In generous,the digital productions provide us great convinence and make our life more and more comfortable,even change our habbit.Today we always stay at home and watch TV to have fun.Internet and computer change the way of social activities,that means we can meet friends and have a chats with them online.Digital productions also have a great effect in works,study,medical,and mangerment that we can have a high effect by software.Digital productions also have a great effect in crimes in the same way.
In my opinion,I think that digital productions change us a lot but we can't dely on them forever.As we know,the more complete the digital productions are,the more difficult that we fix them.In some special situation,if some of them can't work like usual,that may lead us into dangerous situation.
In one word,digital age had arrivaled.We should make good use of the postive impat of it.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 5eb0702e-a03d-39fe-bfd1-9b8b24808467> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowaday,the digital produces is more and more popular,and it's Species is increasing.and it very important in our live!
As it known to us, the digital produces play a very important role in our life.for example
,one of the digital produces cellpone is the necessity of our life,we have to exchange of information with other'poeple by it.And the MP3 also very important to us,we always relase ourseles by listen music on the MP3.And that is so on!
on my opinions, the digital produces is usefull to us,but we should'n crazy to it!

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 9cc5939f-6a3d-3b99-beae-d80998fafcda> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowdays we have entered a digital age.Like TVs,computers,cameras,DVDs and so on,all of them are playing important roles in our daily life,making our daily life more coulourfol.
For example,think about without lights,what will happen?We will stay at a dark conditions at nights,seeing nothing. At the country,once we have a computer,some can see a film relaxing themseves after a days' work.Some can read books online,which can broaden their eyes.Others can wok online and so on.
In my opiniones,digital productions make good contribions to our life.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID ff35c6fc-0b40-3c77-bac0-36d1eb9d5356> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,in our socieyt which is full of modernization,the number of electronic products is larger and larger.More and more people use the electronic products stands for we come into the digital age.Because of the significance of electronic products,they play an important part in our daily life.Not noly do they help us deal with a large number of problems,but they also improve our quality of life.In my opinion,although the electronic products bring the convenience to our life,we shouldn't make our life rely on them completely which lead to the consequence that we can't live without them.All in all,we have to take advantage of electronic products to make our life better reasonably instead of making our life be dependent on them.I believe that we would have a wonderful life with electronic products.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID b4952a40-d29f-33b7-806e-841675dd2652> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, There are more and more digital productions nowadays, such as TV、computer、PSP、MP4 and so on. These digital productions not only make our life become more colourful, but also increase the culural development.
But anything have two sides. Some people may be addicted to the digital world, and waste their all time on digital productions. For example, computer is a great digital productions which can make our life become more convinient and varied. But a lot of teenager are addicted to the computer games, they use all their money and time to play it, and then lose their study.
In my opinion, digital can be helpful for us if we use it by the correct ways. So let us make the digital age become our sowrd, not poison.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID a1c9f898-68bc-3c1a-a555-3a2dd7e56ca6> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays，there are more and more electronic products around us.Such as the PC ,the iphone,the ipad,the camera and so on.
These make a very different from our daily life.We not only get the benifit from it,but also change our life because of the electronic products.On the one hand,it makes our life more colourful.On the other hand,it bring some problem to us.
In a word,whether the electronic products do more harm than good or not,which depends on how we use it.So as a college students,our duty is try our best to let the digital put up its positive impact and avoid its negetive impact.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID dd8df484-c345-33f7-8fd7-b14721d2b04c> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, digital produces almost became a daily necessary for humans, especially mobile phone. No matter what they do or where they go, they will carrying it to get the call, search the map, even to play games. However, there are a question appear gradually. People becoming to consider that if the mobile phone only benefit us and nothing bad for us.
Variety of smartphones appear in our daily life. Indeed, it is more convenient with a phone ,for easier to get in touch with our family ,our friends. And when we come across beautiful scene ,but no camera in our hands,a smartphone can help us with its additional function as a camera. It also kill time when we in queue ,especially long queue.  But as a coin has two sides , we should also see the other side of it. People prefer communicate through cellphones ,rather than talk face to face. More games created ,children love them , they hold a phone  in long time which do much harm to their eyes. Also people run after new style of smartphones. Cause waste.
In my opinion, I think the advantage of mobile phone still take a most important part in our life. It mostly depends on the usage by us. On the other way, whether the phone good or bad just rely on ourselves actually.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID af30d1c3-5535-386e-9dce-652220af88fc> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,with the development of society,thousangs of digital products has came to our life and bring us much convenience.
As we know,the digital products have great influent on all aspects of people's life.For example,the mobilephones shorten the distance between people and makes communication much easier.As we can see,in college,everyone couldn't live without a mobilephone.Secondly,the computers expand our vision of the world towards the internet.As a college student,I can't image how worse and trouble we would be if we don't have a computer.Furthermore,the digital cameras also bring people the colourful life.It's so convenient and little that we can carry and use it in anywhere.
As far as I'm concerned,the digital products also have bad effect on our daily life.We depend much on the e=mail or short messages would make us lose hand-writting skill gradually.What's wprse,we would reduce the exercise times if we sit in front of the television and computer.
In short,if we own the digital products in a right way,we would get great profit from them.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID b7db7e31-a39c-35eb-a6d9-40e344534c6b> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of the society and technology, more and more digital production revel in our life .Such as mobilephone, TV, radio, and even computer.
It is digital production that change our life style. Our life can not leave for digital production, for it has been a part of our life. We can talk to another in mobilephone or in computer. We can communicate with everyone in everywhere with some digital productions.We can know more and more news, and we no need to leave home, with this information era.
In my opinion, digital production is a good thing in our life. However, we should respect nature. Sometimes, we can try live a no digital production lifes. I think it is a romantic thing.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID badb042d-8496-3f33-b35a-28cc572e5cc0> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
According to a recent survey shows that more and more people use the electronic and the new  electronic come up quickly,the phenomenon tells that our scoiety has enter the digital age.
Whih the electronic'development,our daily life has become geat change.On one hand,the electronic take us lots of convinince and let our life become more and more beautiful.For example,the electric light brings us bright and make our dark life colourful;and the moble phone make us can communicate with each other easy and in time wherever you are.In a word,the electronic has bring us so convinence,we also enjoy the digital age.
However,as an old saying goes:"every coin has tow sides!",not only does the digital age bring us positive impact,but also bring us native impact.Sometimes,the electronic is dangerous if we can not use it carefully.Maybe it can load in a fire and make us lose life,maybe it has radiation and effects our health,and so on.
As far as I am concerned,mostly,the digital age bring us happy and beautiful,so we should use the positive impact and cut down the native impact.In a word,we should not make the digital'native impact pretends our scoiety'developping.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID cd19fcc3-ebcc-3c16-968c-8b7d83c2634b> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Everyday we can easily find that somebody take an iphone or an ipad to watch movies or do other thing in the bus or in the subway.In other word,the digital product is very popular nowdays.
No doubtly,the digital product has made our lives a big change.We use them to work,to play game or to search the imformation we need wherever and whenever.In this way,the digital product has great advantages for us.However,each coin has two sides.as we use the digital products,they may be harm to us,especially to our health.Some researchs have delivered that our eyes are declining because we always fix our eyes on the screen everyday,even we are in the bus or dark at night.
In my opinion,the appearence of the digital product means an improvement for us and modern society.we should use these digital products in a right way,rather than let them taka a harm to us.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 3e8454cd-a9b6-3534-bdc9-18852d5c20b3> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,there are many digital products, like cellphone, computer, digital TV and so on.
We can say no digital no life. As we know digital products has influenced our life a lot. We use digital products to work, to entertain, to know world every day .
In my opinion, it is previewed. Because with the develop of world, more infornations we should take every day. It is nessary for people to make more useful way to get infornations.
In the other way, digital products can also lessen the wrong while single send or recive. Use digital single only use high pin and low pin, it can avoid the wrong between the infornaitons were sent. As well, digital products can less cost in films. Before the digital products appear, films alway be saved use gape which cost much money and resoure. Also it helps edit.
In a word, no digital no life.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID fd3e2873-206c-3f53-aa69-d5c2cd47eada> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays more and more digital products appear in our life,like computer,cellphone,TV.We can say that we are living in a digital age.
Digital product plays a vary improtant role in our daily life.For example,with cellphone,we can tlak to our firends and family instead of writing letter,which is very inconveniance.what's more,this kind of product can may our work more easy and save more human resource.But,like a diouble-edged sword,digital product also bring some negetive impact.People become very lazy which cause kinds of sickness.What'worse,the radiation of digital products may be harmful to our health.
In my opinion,we should use them carefully and it will help us greatfully

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 2b29fc07-4ef4-3484-a547-cfebaaeabf89> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
By the step of technology improvement,more and more brilliant technological inventions present nowadays.Such as IPAD,cell-phone,PSP and so on.they become a part of our life--it has been reported that most people can't live without phone even for one day.
On one hand,this technological invevtion help us a lot.Cell-phone make it possible to talk with each other even the two people are in a long distent.PSP and IPAD entertain us wherever we are.When we are in the library,we can do our work with the lap and the conference books instead of carrying so many books between library and home.
On the other hand,technological invention could bring us harm when we over ues of them.Acorrding to the news,many children are shorted-sign because of playing IPAD too much.Besides,electronic products also can be dangerous.Another news said that Iphone show the signs that it might be explor when it was charged.
All in all,elecronic products are good things to build a better life to us in a right way.We have benefited from it obviously.I believe that with the high speed of technological improvement,human beings would invent more and more save,personal and high quality products someday.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 00585f4c-0028-361d-828c-b2f369847ce4> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,electronic products becomes more and more universial in people lives.It covers every aspects of our daily life,such as education,industry,work and so on.Because of convinience it brings to us,the quality of people lives upgrade faster and more efficiently.
You can easily find that some of primary school students play ipad during bying bus or on the subway.No matter what age you are,even though you are an old man,you can master electronic product in a short time and realize the benefits it bring to you.That is why it become more popular today.
In my opinion,everything has two sides.What difference is how to use it.Students will easily get an nearsideness after a long time for electronic games.The adult lose their ability of acting as they dependent on electronic pruducts more.So we should take good adventages of it .

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 35eca66e-e21f-355f-a637-f4970e57a5a3> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
There is no objection about that 21st century is the digital age.Lots of digital products are maked out,such as digital camera,laptop,pad,smart phone,3D TV.I can say
human can not live without digital products in this time.
A great effection is came out from digital products to human beings.It make our
life more easy and wonderful.We can easily connect with friends in any place any time.
We can travel everywhere on air in a time when we just take a sleep.Any precious moments
can be recorded with our digital cameras.
Of course,digital products are not always good things.It depends on how we use it,
it also has a negative effect when we can not face it with a correct attitude.Addicting
network is one of the serious problem in the world.
In my opinion,we should realize what is the digital products to us,then we can make
a good life with the digital products.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 91387fa7-6892-3a12-a483-66c9dd7ae3e0> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
living in the digital life,we are unavoidable expose to all kinds of digital production,such as mobile phone, ipad, notebook computer digital camera and so on....
And today more and more digital production have been invented for making a convenience
in our daily life.
Especially,the digital make a great difference in all kinds of our daily life.For
example,we can not communicate with our friends easily when the mobile phone was not
been invented.Moreover, if the digital camera were not been invented, we will take photo
and wait for a long time to watch our photo. but now we can watch our photo after taking
photo,which help us to choose photo that we like.
in my opinion I considered that the digital is vrey helpful for our life.however,if
we spent much time on it, we will also meet some proplem which will lead us to make a bad
performance in our study. As one's saying "it is a double-edged sword".

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 81a133e5-af6b-35c7-b0ae-8be16c80e7db> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the technologe develop a large number of digital's products had come to our daily life. we can't imagine that a cellphone can taking photo,playing game,and listenning before the digital technologe develop.
This years digital product has change our life in many ways.examples as most college students has their owe cellphones and computers,it is certain we can'n live widiout a cellphone. widiout a cellphone we can't have the massage from our monitor's classmates and other friends.And without a computer we can't do our homework,we can't buy products on internet and so on.Nowadays even our TV signal has change to digital signal, because it can sent more massage and then we have more program to choose.
digital age brings us many convince and now we can't live widiout digital products.we wish that digital world will not stop it's develop step and bring more convince to our life.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID b2535fda-fe1b-3b6d-ac1e-6fb8fe6ac5d4> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
There are more and more digital inventions around us taday.They exite eveywhere and we can not live without them.Because they make our life more abundent and interesting.
The digital production change the way we read,work,talk and so on.There is not doult that the technology of digitation is the mainstream in our sociaty.Nowaday we use the digital book to read which without paper and we can lisent songs and see films in mp3 and mp4.We would not lost the way when we have GPS.So the digital production is very convinious for us.
With the digital we can do more thing we want.It make us live ease and interesting. Though it may make people lazy ang dependent,I think it is benefit for the world.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 8f7a35c9-1a70-377e-80eb-f45a098add53> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of technology and science, nowdays, more and more digital goods come to our daily life.For example, mobilephone,pad,digital camera and so on.many digital that were once luxuries become necessitise.
It is no doubt that the digital goods make a more difference for our life. we can be easy to tall to a person that is distance by mobilephone,we can be easy to search for the information on the internet by computer, and there are a lot of such axemple in our life. It
increasing our life quality and abundance our life. However, the digital goods make a bad difference for our life, some people say that modern people are lack of comunocation as the phone, the privary is easy to be thefted as the internet.
AS for me, I think that the digital goods increased our life. It is a thing the is positive for our life.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 5604b95e-7f4d-3964-8ce3-b42c3db4a95b> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, there is more and more digital product arround us, we said ,'we live in the digital age'.
The digital product which was invented by human beings have deeply changed human beings'
life.For example,today we use the computer to write our text instead of the traditional tool,which is more protecting our Earth.The invention of modern transport made the earth become smaller, and today we can go anywhere in one day. The creation of computer and phone completely change our life.Sometimes we miss an old friend who is far away,we can chat with him by phone, even we can see him by QQ or msn.But anything has two opposite, the digital thing sometimes make us very unhappy,such as we lost our privacy.
INn my opinion,we should create more digital thing to improve our life,but we can use defy our laws and harm others.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 3ab1d874-83fe-379b-8efd-a7557760284a> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowday,the digftal production is becoming more and more kinds using different parts.Therefore,it also affect people from diffrent part.
As it becoming more and more important,the problem arise.Many people think that they can't leave the digftal production,for they are accustomed to it.On my opinion,our life become more convenient and comfortable after there are many digftal production,meanwhile,we  own less and less happyness. So it is reasonable to use the digftal,but we don't believe it can do everyhing for us.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 078f40bb-1f4a-338b-bba4-8a7ca1a6141f> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowaday, our live are fulfill by digital production, personal computer, televison,
and so many digital production.
Digital production totally change our lifestyle. We can konw everything about the
world without leaving our home because we has Internet. we can stay at home and watching
the World Cup without 30 seconds delay because we have televison. We never worry about
living far away from our family because we have mobile phone. Digital production make our
life more and more convenient, on the other hand, there are many people think we are too
depend on our digital production. Though we can phone our family and friends easier than
before, we relate our family less than before.
On my oppion, digital production make our life more convenient, but we should not
tooo depend on our digital production, we use it but not depend on it, and it will make
our life full of happiness.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 9fe6ffb1-ab42-3965-83ce-b96361a38d9c> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,more and more digital age take part to our daily life,the compute,the care,the TV ,the mobilphone and so on,the robat change our life become more and more easer.It is also give our life many convinience.
Many people think that when technology develop happines will natruly follow. but let me tell you that nothing is further from the truth.althouge nowadays the digital age is very advance,but survey tell us that the result is difference,ther is no doult that the robat close the people relationship, but the more quation are turn out,such as the pollution, traffic jam,city noisy,the unknow call and so on;
As far as I'm concerned,the digital age like a coin has positive aspact and also have the other side--negative aspact.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 29caa03b-f6ad-3f67-8b45-636527d93aef> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowdays,more and more electronic products appear in the market,such as MP3,MP4,GPS and so on.
Than as the delevoment of technology,the more function the electronic products have.The mobile phone,it can use as a MP3 and a MP4,it can get on line,it can work as a GPS.It's no doubt that the mobile phone bring many convenience,but it also bring negtive effect for our life.
Because of the function that GPS of the mobile phone,we should never lose our way. On the other hand,that maybe make that many people never remenber the way.
In my oppinion,the electronic products we should use them,but we should use them as we really neccicery

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 6f92ad28-5e1b-3e74-9f6f-2496fe52852c> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of The Times,there are more and more electronic products.These electronic products made a great impact on people's life.Now,I'll talk about electronic products in my own opinions.
First,there's no doubt that electronic products make our life more wonderful and colorful.We can use them to chat online,play game,  watching the news,and so on. Second,electronic products make the life of people more convenient.For example,if we want to look books or listen to the music,we can use an MP4 or an iphone do these things at any time,any place.
However,there are also some disadvantages in electronic products.Above all, most electronic products are very expensive and waste a lot of electrical quantity.Useing electronic products doesn't protect the environment. After that,people will become lazy,if they often use electronic products.People's the ability of thought and work will be dropped.
In conclusion,I think using electronic products should be moderate.In this way, electronic products will make our life more and more beautiful.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID b60e962f-df28-364b-8630-d22fd1bdb714> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of society,there are more and more eletricity goods,like TV,MP4,PC, in our life. It is convinient for us to use these digital goods to content with our neccesary and solve our problems,so we always depend on them.
However,ever thing has two coins,the digital age also bring some problems,which influences our life.For one thing,our eyes become more and more weak due to use the eletricity goods too often and too long.For another,People become more lazzy so they have little passion in their job.
In a word,we should use the eletricity goods correctly in the digital age.Only doing this,our life will become more and more beautiful.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 63669a62-c350-3042-89fd-a462c225754c> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As technology develops, more and more digital poductions come to our eye. You can see
different digital poductions at work or at home. Even I hear that some primary schools use
ipad as a tool for teaching lesson. Believe it or not, we can not spend even a day without
using digital poductions.
Due to the digital age coming, life of man completely changes. For one thing, these
poductions make impossible things possible. You can talk with your friends no matter how
far away you are with just a small mobile phone anywhere and anytime. You also can fly in
the air with plane. It is fantasy when in the early years. For another thing , it makes
our life easy. When you want to fine something, just sit at your home on internet but in
library.
As to me, I think we need more and more digital poduction to fill with our life. What
we need to do just accept they are but object.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 168d50a0-2cca-3919-8ebd-9fa9593cdb2b> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the development of technology,there are more and more electronic goods,like mobilephone, playstation,Xbox and new TV. Some electronic goods we can not see several years ago are everywhere  now.
The development of technology change our lives. It makes our lives more convenient, Like the mobilephone. Today the mobilephone is not a tool which is used for communication. It can search the Internet, shopping online, play games, work and even pay for things. So we can travel and work with only a mobilephone. we can go around the world bringing a mobilephone.
Of course, it will bring us some trouble at the same time. If we can do everything with our mobilephone. Once we lost our mobilephone, it mean that we lost everything we have, our account, our private information and so on. So we may live in trouble. Because we are affrid of losing it.
On my opinions, electronic goods bring us convenience, but also bring us many trouble. No matter what it will be, technology bring us  more advantages than disadvantage. So we must make full use of it. Let the electronic goods bring us a safe and convenient sociaty.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID d39e231d-65c6-3fdb-9c35-0ada80244c9b> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of the technology , the electronic products become more and more in our daily life at present .The electronic products have a big impact on human beings'life in all directions.there are many electronic products round us ,such as cellphone,comuter,camere,calculator,watch and so on.
In my opinion, the electronic products is very important and necessary for us .Only with it can our life become more and more interesting and convenient.for example,with the telephone,people can communicate with others who is in distance whenever they want. So , the electronic products is a good things for us.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID a032f214-62be-334d-96d5-fead3c83d98e> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we known,more and more digital were used by people nowaday.Such as computer,mobile phone,cemera.
It is no doubt that digital change our lives a lot almost in all sides. Take mobile phone for example,now,with mobile phone,we can connect with people nearly all over the world.Beside,mobile phone also privide us lots of entertainmeng,listen music,play small games,serch in internet and so on.
As far as I am concerned,it is sure that digital bring too much convinen for us,which help our lives become more and more easy.In other way,a lot of disturb were made by digital.Obviously,the digital produce make large of rubbish,which will harm our environment.Furthermore,some student can not get rit of the fictitious space,which casued by digital.So,in a word,digital,use or uselee,just decided by how to ues it.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 7df78b76-661f-366a-8c2d-7f5e7cf8e615> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,there are more and more digital products,which play an important role in our daily life.Such as the computer,which we use it to play computer games,listen music,watch videos and so on.Thus,we can draw a conclusion that the digital products make our life colourful.
To sum up,the digital products have influenced our life in different roles.To start with,people can use the digital products to do the housework,such as wash their clothes,clean the floor.Next,with the useful function of mobile phone,people can get in touch with others conviniencely.Furthermore,the digital products make people's life more and more colourful and funny.
In my opinon,I think the digital products make a very difference in my daily life.I can use the MP4 to listen music which can relax myself.Besides,I can use it to do all kinds of things that I am intereted in and which make me feel fun.Obviously,the digital products draw us to the digital age.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 83f910bb-3fd3-39b4-b4bb-45d942109de6> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, digital products, such as computers, digital TVs, digital cameras, MP3 players and MP4 players, are widely used. Our life is full of electronic products now,and it really change our lives largely.
Electronic products makes our life more continue .For example ,we use mobil phone everyday,it can make us keep touch with our family and friends which far away from us easily, I donnot know What our lives will become if there is no phone .
In the other hand ,electronic products also gives us some big helps when we study.for example ,class with a  computer can help us learn deeply ,sonetimes computer can do many things  which  we can not do ,such as mapping listening and the other difficult things .
In my opinion ,I think electronic products has many adventages and mang disadventages at the same time ,so we should use it reasonable but not uncontrolled.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 89dd58e5-7788-3287-ba4c-2a1b66b62630> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, with the development of technology and science, the inventions of the digital
product are more universal and popular. As we all know, the 21th century is the digital age.In our daily life, now we are surrounded by the digital products and use them almost everytime everywhere.In other words, we can't live without the digital products now.
The digital product has made lots of differences on all kinds of aspects of human being's life. For example, the mobilephone, with which, we can talk with others who we want no matter when and where. It not only make convenientments for us but make the correlations between people deeper and deeper. Another, the computer, we use it on many kinds of fields, such as entertainments, serach information, shopping, and work. Also, with the traffic tools, we can go everywhere and save lots of time. Thanks to them, the world is like a big family liveing in a country.
As far as I'm concerned, I am infavor of the invention of the digital product. Because they benifit us lots and make our lives more and more funny. However, we should make good use of them to make them serve our lives more adaptly.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 0935eb1c-a344-35af-8e11-c3a271d4e9bf> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
It's acknowledged that computers and other machines has become an dispensable part of our society,which make our life more comfortable and less laborious.
When it comes to the influence of digital on our everyday life,it's so wide and publical to describe it.Easy to see,people in growing number are becoming more and more dependant on our computers and Internet,which is a comment affair in mordent society.We can easily communicate with our friends and others via emails,buy everything we want by electricical web,play games on telephone instead of on Internet....
Digital products not only change our life ,but also our world.Mnay academic area are  uesd to keeping their study throught traditional ways or material.But now,they preffert using digital products ,like computer,camera, to keep mkae their study more convinent and serious.
However,some parents may complaint that there are some trouble bringing to their life--More and more children may be so crazy about the digital time that they always do bad in their study.In addition,something is wrong in communication while they talk to others face to face,because they spend more time on computers than go outside to join some activities.
There is no deny that every coin has two sides.Although digital age has it own disadvantage,we still have to rely on it so that we can lead a happier and more convenient life,along with the pogress of society.
Least but not the last,along with the benefits of such machines,employees must study knowledge involved in such machines so that they are able to control them,that's to say,wo must do well in our study so that we could  master digital age well in the future.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID b23b9dd5-cfbe-3f30-b8d1-faac7815c131> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
whith the development of the science,nowadays people make a great changes in their life living.More and more digital products show up and benefit us a lot.
Digital products make a great impact on many aspect of living.Entertainment become colorful,because we can play games online with others ,listen music or watch Television when you are bored.I think that communication is the most change.due to the digital product,we can talk or look even if we have a remote distance.
As far as i am concerned,digital products can give us many benefits,however we shold be careful to deal whith it.currenty,most people perfer to stay home.as a result,they lack of skills in society.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID d036e0c9-10a0-376f-986d-50dbc26162a5> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,there are more and more electronic products coming to our life in such modern world.It almost exeists in every apsect of our life.
There is no doubt that the electronic products can bring us huge convenience and in the meantime ,it can make our life easier .But every coin has two sides.In our daliy life,people almost do everything with it instead of using our own phsical power.The life without the electronic produts is unimaginable in such society which is full of cellphone ,laptop and so on.
As a university student,i have my own cellphone and computer.I can say that the electronic products is an important part of my life.I use it to do what i need to do.It makes my life smoother.But should we be slave of it.No,wo are just using it.So,in my opinion,we should use the electronic products wisely and be the master of it.In such digital age,what we supposed to do is using without independece.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID e6b4ac09-3a14-31df-8de3-30e8554508ee> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
In modern world,there are more and more digital products.As a man lives in the civilized society,it's almost impossible for anyone of us to use none of digital products.So ,maybe we can call the time "the digital age".In this condition,maybe many of us will ask "does these things improve our lives?"
It's no doubt that we can work much faster with these equiments.Also , these equiments ,with the help of internet,make the world smaller and smaller.So in this age ,we can contact with friends or anyone even they are thousands of miles away from where we are.Also ,with these equiment,we have much more fun than before.As you know,we can take photos to keep our happy memory forever.Also,we can play game with computers when we have nothing else to do.These equiment bring so many advantages that it's impossible for me to explained it to you within several hundered words.
But coins have two sides.It's suitable to describe digital products with this word.These equiments are so inficient that we needn't to do much extra work.It save our time.But we have missed the proccess to find the answer with the help of them.That means we have less and less chance to train ourselves.For example,the computer can solve many proplems,but if children use them to find the answer of a math problem that they will never know where the answer come from.Obviously,that not what we want.In another hand,not only children play the games day and night ,but also the adult.In the proccess of playing games ,they will never think about their studies and work.Also,thanks to the outstanding digital products,we dont have to remember many things like phone numbers.But what if we lost in a forest and the equiment are out of battery.At that time ,we must feel helpless and bored.At this time ,another thing happened because when we are bored ,we want to play games with digital products.But they are out of battery.So , things goes worse and worse.
In my opinion,I think digital products are good despite of so many disvantages they have.Even in these condition,we can't forget about the contributions made by them.What we have to do isnt stop use them,but be less reliable to them.For example ,in our study,we should know the how to figure out a problem first ,and next time ,we can use the computer to  find the answer.With the method,we use the advantages of digital products and conquer the disvantages.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID ad6b30c1-1310-3f02-9f7b-8035b559a206> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
The 21st centry is the digital age.The electronic products are more closely related to our lives.Nowadays we can see more and more kinds of electronic products in our lives.At the same time,we find that we can't leave them in our study,our work,our amusement and so on.
On the one hand,our study is not the same as the past.We used computer to learn English.We can do listening exercise in the computer and the results better than the previous.The computer simplifies our homework on the steps.Some people say that the students of the 21st century should use a computer to learn.If we want to find some information,we can surf the Internet to finish it.Conveniently, anytime, anywhere you can surf the Internet as long as you gently tap your cell phone or your PC.When we feel tired,nervous or agitated,the MP3 can help us take it easy.You may say the how magic the electronic products are.And you can't leave them.
On the other hand,the electronic products also have a bad side.People become lazy because of the electronic products.Some people think that electronics products is omnipotent,so they don't finish their work by their hands.There are people all day indulging in electronic products as electronics products are their lives.And as we all know the electronic products have a strong radiation that does harm to our health.We shouldn't addicted to the electronic products.In a word,we should moderately use the electronic products.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID c18ea51c-efe6-3ea4-a509-bd77f710b4c2> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, more and more electronic products have been appeared and become our important and useful things in our life. They affect every sides of human deeply.
Of course, today is the information world. Every people use electronic products. They can help people to do many things. But they let people lost another thing in the same time. More and more people use the electronic products in every time. They play computer and watch TV when they rest on the home. And then, the mobile phone will be brought every time when they go out to meet other people and it will be played in their action. It let people have less and less communicated with other people. And the world becomes cooler and cooler. So we should learn to control ourselves and do more exercise and talk with other people more often.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 3af945b5-83d3-3b35-b108-fe10d00d0324> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the science and technology develop faster and faster,the electronic product become more and more universal.People say that the digital age is coming.
We take a digital camera not a film camera when we take photos.And almost all people have a mobile phone in hand.Computers become a universal tool in our society.All of these tell us that it's a digital age.And the electronic product make a big difference in people's life in all directions.
Though the electronic product provide a great deal of convenience to us,and we cann't deny that it's a symbol of development,it also have many bad things.The radiation of electronic products does harm to our health.As we all know,almost all electronic products have radiation which may lead to cancer.The electronic products provide us convenience,but can make us lazy at the same time.In my opinion,the electronic product a double-edged sword which we should use reasonably.
In a word,we cann't rely on them excessively.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 1ca7208e-a150-3d60-8a7f-28cef179295a> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the fast development of technology,humanbeing have been inventing many different kinds of technological products like computer,GPS,3D TV , Mobile Internet Device,smart mobilephone and efficient lightbulb,nearly covering al kinds of spheres.But the most were widely used is digital products.
Nowadays,almost everybody has one kinds of gigital products at least which were mostly used in study,entertainments,communication and make their life,works and study to be convenience.For example,the digital products have  great effect on perple’s work which has become easier than before.Some works used to be performed ooutoors can now be done in the an comfortable office.As a study ,now I can puickly look up any work I do not understand in the gigital dictionary ,but usually it can be done in the tradictionary paper dictionaries.What more ,we also can improve our English listening bility with the mp4 or mp3 ,which we used to can’t imagine.In 2005,my mother bought a cameral with which I have taken many pitures of every memorable moment. I found my life become colourful after there was a cameral in my home.
Our society has entered a gdigital age,I believe more digital products will be created in the future ,and they will continue to have a great impact on our life,study and work.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 9683d7f0-61e0-3ad8-8c10-e50707711828> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,there are more and more digital productions.They along with social progress and development.We can see them everywhere.
The digital productions are used widely.They can make light for people in the night.We can do a large number of things through digital productions,such as shopping、studing、chatting、doing business and so on on the computer.We also can use them to cook food and to do the precision of the operation.They ofen be used to take plass of people to do the dangerous things.They change people's way of life.In a word,electronic products on every aspect of people's life has had the very tremendous influence.
Everything has two coins,digital productions bring people convenience,but they will make people become lazy.So we should have a deep understanding of the digital productions and clever to use them.Let them become our life really good helper.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 494c65a0-84b3-335b-b4e7-c29a66b1a087> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays digital productions become more and more popular in our lives and the amount of them is constantly increasing.As a result,digital productions now have a great influence on every aspects of our world.
Being in a digital age,firstly,we use digital productions such as mobile phone,laptop,GPS system when we are out. with the help their offers,we  can get in touch with the world whenever and, won't be lost,in even a place with extremly complex landmains. In other words, we use digital productions to guide our way.Secondly,we also use them to communicate with others.For example, mobile phone is a most important things for people to communicate,discuss,date,and etc and, the telephone as well.Besides,digital productions are also used in our daily life.Lamps,personal computers,cameras can be several examples for this.
all in a words,digital producions are now playing a vital role in our life.As far as I am concerned,I consider digital productions to be important and even,essential to our life.And I hope the development of digital producions can be more rapid and efficient in such a digital age.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 1f2648f7-3b98-3f05-9ebc-4441ad3e7e77> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowdays,more and more digital production turn out in our eyes.In other words,we come into the digital age.
As we all known,these digital productions are very functional.No one can not live without the digital productions.We need to communicate with our friends by our mobile phone,we need to know some news by watchting TV,we need to have class by using computer.In a word,the digital productions are playing an important role in our live.
In my notions,after the humans came into the digital age,our lives have be improved by the high technology productions.It makes our lives more comfortable,more convenient,and more happiness.These are its advantages.However,we can't rely on its all the time.If we usually depend on it,we would forget some human skill such as writing.Finally,every coin has two sides,and if we can used its advantages well,our lives must can be more comfortable.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 37f1ef48-00b5-35bf-8b84-3cd014eff1ff> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,there are more and more digital product in our world.And our lives are also surround by those product.For example,in the last few years,the Iphone,Ipad and the Mac Book that producted by Apply have become popular all over the world.Almost one in four people have the Iphone.
The digital products are making great influence in all around.For one thing,the digital products have changed the ways that people live,work and communicate.Everything in our lives can be contrlled by the computer and run intellective.And we also work with our computer or notebook which can help us work more efficiently and relax.Futher more,our telephones make our distance between our family and lover disappear and we can talk in any time.For anther things,digital product is so important for us that everyone would like to buy them,which in other way improve the development of enconmy and society.
As for me,I am also a fan of the digital product.I use telephone outside and use my notebook to study and have fun in dormitory.In my opinion,not only for me,but aslo for another people,digital product is an necessary.But we should use it in a correct way.It is one of the tools that help our work and lives,instead of all our lives.We shouldn't be addited to it.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 04aaedca-90e9-3ddc-85f0-cc8d3988683a> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowaday,sociaty is developing faster and faster.It is unable to avoid that the speed of electronics have beyonded our imagination speed.However,personal life depends on electronics normally which can influence our life.For example,mobilphone is a essentials when people need to contact with others.It seems that computer could do everything so that people must possess it.Recently,apple mobile phone is popular with people,because of it,some people buy it blindly in order to follow the crowd.This phenomenon indicates that the vanity of people is the extreme expansion and cause the bad social conduct.
In my view,the reason of making more and more electronics is to meet the needs of the society and service people better,so we should understand the true need of us clearly and avoid to follow the fashion blindly in order to make ourselves better and make social development better.In particular,we are students who should devote ourselves to studying,so it is unnecessary that we buy more electronics.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 82f97af0-a273-31d7-aa6a-0efb9c18e6ac> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we know, many kinds of digital products are full of our life.Digital
camera,digital TV,digital radio,more and more electronic products have been turn up.
By the way,with the improvement of technology,it's sure that we will more use the electronic products in our daily life.Of course,they have conveninent our life a lot.For example,maps have been replaced by GPS;Books have been replaced by I-book;Even drivers have been replaced by computer.But,can you image all have been replaced by electronic products.
We must notice that such products are weaken our thinking.Because of these,we think little,we try little and we don't learn more.We just know how to use the electronic products.When it's more convenient,we are more stupid.So,at the same time we use the products,we must keept learning.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 8eb1f2cd-68c3-343f-a6fb-03f5f343529b> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,our life can't do without the electronic products.
The digital age coming,human's life become very simple.As for housework,we don't need to wash our clothes by ourselves any more.we can use the aspirator to clean the house easily.As for entertainment,we  can surf the web useing mobile phone ,mid or pad in bus.As for learning,we can join the class online so that we can learn at home.
As far as I am concerned,electronic products can help human but always can lazy human.If electronic products disappear now,I think many people who rely on it will go mad.So, how can we deal with this trend?First,we should learn the product how to produce.In another word,we know theory.Second,we can set a month called "nature month".In the "nature month",we can't use any electronic products.In another word ,we can't forget how to use our hand to alive.In the end,we can't forget that nowadays is how to engender.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 3ab1d874-83fe-379b-8efd-a7557760284a> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowday,the digftal production is becoming more and more kinds using different parts.Therefore,it also affect people from diffrent part.
As it becoming more and more important,the problem arise.Many people think that they can't leave the digftal production,for they are accustomed to it.On my opinion,our life become more convenient and comfortable after there are many digftal production,meanwhile,we  own less and less happyness. So it is reasonable to use the digftal,but we don't believe it can do everyhing for us.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID a03ef05d-6056-3678-bc53-68aa5bb4d644> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,there comes the digital age.And you are likely to ask me what is The digital age.And I think I will show you The Digital Age by showing you the situation in it.
You can see that there are more and more digital produces nowsdays.And the digital produces are not only full of our eyes,also full of our life.There is no doubt that the digital produces have a important impact in our life n different way.Even most of people can not have a good life without the digital produces.From this point we can see the important meaning the digital produces have done.
In my personal opinion,in one way the above situations are the progress of our socialty.And I am glad to see the the more and more digital produces are used in many way as possible.We should show our welcoming to The Digital Age's coming.why?Easily,it can work for people with its functions.
In another way,we should not rely on its functions.I think you will ask me why.
Isn't it the resource in our life.Yes,you are right.But do you want to live in the world where only the digital produces.I think you have get the answer.As you can see,there are still a lot of beauty.We can do thing by ourselves.For example,your grandmother must be more happier if she get your letter instead of getting your e-mail.
So the digital produces is not right or wrong.The key is what we do with it.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 715b1f56-0732-3314-ab09-9970788f5528> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,the digital products are more and more important in our life as well as the sciencer invented more and more digital products.from this,we can konw that the digital products are frequent the people's life in every part.And then,they can make our life more and more colorful.But we know,everything takes good and bad.
As far as I am concerned,I think the digital products are more helpful than harmful.Although they will frequent the study of the teenagers,they also help us everywhere.So I think they are good.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 07fe8f0b-eb9f-3dab-93b3-9bcec3d6b284> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
These years,the science has developed so far that the electronic products are producted more and more.As everyone knows,the electronic products influent in every part of the people’living.For example,we always chat with friends on the Internet,do homework and look in some material through the computer.These time,I think everybody like us in these year or younger than us would have a telephone,and we always chat with our family or friends with it.By the way,all of us have TV,computer and so on in our family.As you can see the influence of electronic products play?
As far as I am concered,the electronic products has influented in our living everyday.To become teenager of the digital age,we should learn to use the electronic products to reach the success.And I think the electronic products will develop fast and play an important part in our future.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 90118ad3-2393-3010-8783-b41e1b8eb961> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Now,there are more digital products in our lives.Such as iphone,MP3,MP4,which make our lives interest and convinent.
We can listen to the music,read news,see the movies,play games ererywhere.Besides,we can study with our digital products.However,the digital products also bring bad influence to us.Our eyes are influenced when we are using the digital products,which low our eyesight.As the same as our eyes,our ears are hurt when we listen to the music with MP3 all the time.Even worse, some students play games with their phones in the classes,which makes their study bad.
In my opinion,now people can't live without the digital products.Therefore, we should use the digital products in the best way.The digital products are produced for people to interest their lives.So,we should rightly use the digital products so that we won't be hurt by the products.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 6b96156d-5f99-356c-9e9a-5f82278b4206> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,there are more and more digital products coming into our lives.The mobile phone,computer,televesion,etc.there is no doubt that our lives was changed deeply in every side by the digital products.We are in the digital age now.                                    For ,example,before the electric light invented,there was too dark for people to do most of things.And we couldn't know what happened in the outside world through our eyes in home beore the television invented.What's more,I think what influent our life most deeply is the invence of computer.Althought the computer was used to calculate firstly,now we can use the computer to work,to play games to relase,to know what happened in the outside world.It makes our lives very conveniency.But in the other word,the more the digital products be made,the more resource we are use and the more digital rash will be made.
As I know,the strenghs of the digital products are more than the weaks.We can leave the digital poducts to live nowadays.As the technolgy developing,I think we can use more less resource to produce the digital products.The digital age will not stop but be more powerful in the future.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 113ad5c8-dbdd-31d9-8dff-a9ed11456637> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the economy developing,the digitals are more widely used in our life.And the digitals are affect everythings of our life,so we can not get away from them.The digitals are various,because we can find them in the every place.For example,we use the mobile phone everyday,and many people must use it every day. With  the diversity of the mobile phone applications,many people addicted in playing the mobile phone in everywhere and everytime,and many teenagers have not motivation to study for it.But we can't denied the mobile phone get our many benefits.It make our more easy to talk with the other people who are far away form us,and in the economy,the mobile phone plays a crucial role.
So I think we can't say the digitals are good or bad for our life.With the increasing of the number of digitals,we almost impossible to get away form digital,and we also don't need to do it,because if we use good of digitals,they will get our life more convenient,and can better to promote the development of our enconomy.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 61626552-a4a5-314a-8cca-f1b0b172f44d> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Today,peiple used more electronics than before.
The electronics has infected our daily life in every espects.When we work we need the computer,it can make our work easily.When we talk ,we usualy use the moblephone,when we use it we can talk even we are in the different place,and the moblephone are much useful than before,we can also use it surf the intert.
There too many electronics in our daily life,we use it to make our life much better,the electronics palyed a inportant charactor in our life.So I think if the electronies disappeared in our life,we will faced lots of difficulties,and our life will loes some happiness.so we can not live without the electronics,and our future will better with the electronics.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 8e94bd32-dbff-3526-b49d-96b7938d41df> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays the electronic products become more and more popular. And electronic products have great impact on many aspects of our life. In my opinion, electronic products enrich our life and feed mental need. However, there are also some disadvantages of electronic products. Children can’t help themselves focusing on the electronic products. This situation arises high rate of disease like near eyesight, obesity. Adults may lost themselves in electronic games, too. Therefore, we must make clear understanding on electronic products.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID b5cd47bd-6a97-33a3-af6d-545c0f2e3b16> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowsday,the quantity of the digital foods become more and more,and the influences of the digital foods are getting deeper and deeper toward all acept of our life.For example,the computers become much more normal than 20 years ago,and the digital English-learn machine get a room in so many family which has childs.The digital pens、digital books、digital watches are also begin to open the market from the people.
I am also the one influenced by the digital foods.As for me,I use computer everydays,if I have not play computer one day,I will become uncomfortable.If all of the digital foods are dispper form the world,I can not image how the world will become.The digital foods make a big contribute to the progress of the human being,but some problems are rising.Some people are missing in the computers or use the computers to do some illegal things.Also,most of the digital foods can hurt our eyes.For this,many childs must take up the glasses.
The digital has both adventages and shortcomings.Ues it in right way,it will help you a lot.On the contrary,it will destory you!

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 4ea478a2-4938-3f2b-906f-458f900e7220> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,as the improvment of technology ,the digital produce become
more and more ,also the price pf that become cheaper and cheaper.And many digital things aroud us have become the necessatise.
So that the digital things have great affect on our daily life,such as
education, entainment,comnunication and so on.
As far as i am concerned, the digital things would become an important
role in our daliy life, beside, they would make people more convieniant in some places.In the contratly,the digital things have bad affect on people like ray,short-sight,poor in connunication.In short,ervey coion
have two sides. Even if many bad affect from digital things,the digital age would come soon and the advantige more than the short.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 8f9b21bb-fa4e-3f4c-97d7-8ea18dd0e40d> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,more and more digital produce come into our lives.It has many influences in our ways to live.For example,we can stay at home but  know a lot of news.We can keep in touch with everyone by mobilephone wherever we go.Computer plays an important role in our lives.People use computer to work,play games and study.Mobilephone helps people comnunicate with others easily.
In my opinion,digital produce has his advantages and disadvantages.Digital produces actually improve people lives.As we all know,people couldn't lead a live that has not digital produce.But digital produce's disadvantages are paied attention by more and more person.Some people's children fall in love with computer games.They give up study and put their hearts in computer games.This will lead to a bad relationship between parents to  children.what's more?Digital produce will do harm to our health.But people pays little attention to this.
In a word,we should use digital produce in a right way such as work and have a break.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID c63cfd0b-21ba-3da9-9a1e-9ac41be2bc14> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,it's not strange to see the digital everywhere.Our life have been filled in with lots of digital like the MP3,MP4,handsets and so on.As the time rolled by,the disign of digital become more and more convience for people,which bring comfort and fun to our life.To be honest,that the digital having changing quickly occur to us exactly owe to the great scientific techology.
And the digital help our life a lot.For example,in the field of study,we can use the digital dictionary to find the unkonwn word or difinition easyly.For the police working,it's also useful that police can use the digital to have a test with someone drinking a lot or use other digitial tool to put out the criminal gang.In our daily life,we use handset to contact with ohers even we both have a long distance.we use moving digital,so we can scan the news everywhere.Our chicken also can be setted lots of digital which help us directly control the quality of food.In the a word,the digital make our life colorful.
I was apealed to the digital.I was a big fan of digital.As is well known,where the great digital come from is human's inspriration.And I love this.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID c7bace3c-3b44-3b28-bd86-ef4333ba3b87> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
The digital produces present faster and faster.The people always want to buy the last one and this is becoming to be a smart behavior.They don't think if the new digital produce suit with them but just want to be a shamt boys or smart girls.
And now,I just want to say 'wht's the hell with them?Are they serious?'I don't think the boy or girl who's mobile is Iphone4s is a smart one.Last mouth,it has a weibo which be the highline of us.The weibo was presented at the inprivite user as the name of GUANGGONGSHUDONG by the one nobody known except himself or herself.The weibo acctully says the boy in GDUT and the girl in a foregin languege collage to have a dating.The girl said that the boy is very ugly and don't want cost money because the boy didn't pay the money for that girl and the boy's mobile is NOKIA but the girl's is Iphone4s.She looks down upon the boy because he uses the NOKIA mobile.
I don't want to talk to this weibo everything except one.I just want to ask the girl 'does a boy who use Iphone4s prove anything,prove he is a tall,handsome,rich one?Does a boy who use NOKIA prove he is a DIAOSI?"F**k up.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 11ebe568-e0cf-34f6-87b0-119b57c44fc2> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all knowd,more and more electronic products come into our life,which make our life more colourful.
In fact,electronic products play an imporant role in our life.Here are some reason to support this idea.For one thing ,electronic product would be a good tool fo free usand make us more healthy,besides,we can know some imporant things happedned in our country even in other country more quickly by use electronic product,for another ,electronic products also make our life become easyer,for example,we can get in touch withour friend more easyer by using telephone.
Just as the old saying goes,'every coinhas two sides 'and so does the electronic products.They also have some disadvantages.For example ,some students  play computer games too often,which makes their healthy and study become pourer.Besides, some electronic products are in high price and more people don't have the enough money to afford them.Last but not least,using electronic product too long every time isn't good our eyeside and physical and mental healthy.
in a word,we should make good use of electronic products in ourlife.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 0903db2e-2cfb-36e8-8bd9-5266d8a8a55b> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
In our modern life, it’s difficult for us to live without the digital equipment, like the mobile phone,computer,digital camera and so on.
Nowadays,we have entered the digital age.As time went by,our technology become more and more advanced.And the electronic euuipment become much  and more.We should use them in a proper way,becuse it can help us,but also may do harm to our health.
The digitals have influenced our life greatly.Those things surely give us convinience,but they also are harmful for our health. Through the mobile phone,we can communicate with others nowatter how long the distance is.We can serch some useful things on the computher through the searching engine,and can solve some difficult questions easily.However they also do harm to our health,like if we use it too long time,our body will become tired.If we stare at the screen,our eyes may become short sight.The even worse,the digitals may give out radiation which may cause cancer.
But totally speaking,the digitals’advanges are much more than the shortages.After all,they are the technological things which were invented by our great scientists.We should use them in the proper way.And don't use the long time and to make our body have a rest.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 3e8454cd-a9b6-3534-bdc9-18852d5c20b3> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,there are many digital products, like cellphone, computer, digital TV and so on.
We can say no digital no life. As we know digital products has influenced our life a lot. We use digital products to work, to entertain, to know world every day .
In my opinion, it is previewed. Because with the develop of world, more infornations we should take every day. It is nessary for people to make more useful way to get infornations.
In the other way, digital products can also lessen the wrong while single send or recive. Use digital single only use high pin and low pin, it can avoid the wrong between the infornaitons were sent. As well, digital products can less cost in films. Before the digital products appear, films alway be saved use gape which cost much money and resoure. Also it helps edit.
In a word, no digital no life.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 77042184-dbf7-3d50-b990-1f527770ccf8> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, with the development of technology, more and more digital
product are produced. Such as mp3,mp4,iPAD.People can do more activity.
We can use the mobile phone to communicate with our friends and families.
And we can also play games and listen to music.No mater where, we can use the loptop to do our work. The Digital have affected our life and will make larger affection.
From my of view, the Digital can develop our life, but we may form some bad accustom. Some people may not like to communicate with others face to face.And someone may be lazier.
We should make the most of the digital, and we can attain more happiness.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 6d31d8c3-e4b5-3047-b304-59d38a3dde85> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, you can see digital products everywhere. For instance, people play cellphones or PSPs or even iPads on their way to school or to work when they are on the undergound or in the bus. In a word, the world is surrounded by the digital products.
Since the Apple products become famous not only in personal computers but also in music players and especally in cellphones and the newly born tablet personal computers---Xpads, the whole world become crazy fans of Apples---they focus on all Apple products of all generations and the new products will be the focus that the digital world pay attention to in months. Because of the birth of some websides such as Facebook and Sina microblog, the impects of mobile devices are larger and larger.
As far as i'm concerned, i think digital products are more helpful than harmful. Some people may say that digital products do harm to their eye-sight and make some kids lost themselves in games. What come across me firstly is that knives and guns are also used to hurt victims by some crazy guys. The critical point is how you use it.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 1ca33288-fb12-3ca1-a9f1-5c4969d9e799> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Today the digirals are more and more,and our life can not leave it.
The digirals changge our life much more.We can get some informs from the compucter or play games or work in it.The mobile phone let us find people easyer than no mobile phone.Every family must be have TV,because TV is more important in our life,we can get a lot of in it.The digital give us more good things but it also take some bad things,like compucter games some children also paly it but forget study and we can write by the computer but forget use the pan and so on.
we shold use the digital in right way,only from it we can let our life better and better.If we can not use it in right way our life only can be worse and worse.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 00b43f5c-f20d-3236-a429-5e22a3faed93> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, more and more electronic machine had been produced. No one can live a life without them. In addition, high quality technology provide us a more conveniently and better life.
For the example, the telephone called “iphone” has changed our life more. Not only can it used to conmunicate with you families or friends, but also you can make it a game machine. There is no doubt that "iphone" is not just a telephone . It is a micro-computer at all.
In my opinions, electronic productions play a more and more important role in our life. They help us save our time and release many work of us. However, to much electronic productions will reduce our skill of ourselves. We may became very lazy after the life full of digital productions. Besides, a lot of interesting things must lost from our life. So, boring will be a biggest worry in the life last.
In a word, electronic productions benefit us a lot as well as making us lost a lot. As the saying goes, every coin has two sides. Using them in a balanced way is the most important thing we should do.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 93d111a3-a7c2-3c0c-b135-6861358d8f11> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,science have a great progress and more and more digital product appear.As we all known,Apple mobile-phone is popular over the world because of its advanced quality.The kind of Moblile people used few years ago was quited today.
Digital product play an important role in people's life.For example,many digital product can surf net well so the users will search information by it.Now In the street,there are lots of men looking down rather than looking forward,bucause everyone is using their digital product.Not only Mobile becomes better and better,but also the computer,the Mp3 or Mp4 have a good quality,they bring convenience to every one.However,because of its good quality,games becomes better that leads to teenagers pay more attention to it rather than their study.And many people can't leave their digital product,otherwise they will be unhappy that means they change underdogs under these product.
In my opinion,we should have a good attitude towards our digital product.We should control ourself well and use product in the rigrt time or place.In a word,digital product is neccessary in our life,but was used in a right way.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID e2923e61-7fbd-3cd8-9b00-b98492d86687> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, most family have three or more electronic products, like computers,TV,mobilephones and so on.So,digital products has a great influence in people's live.
More and more young people are shopping online since they have computers, because they found that shopping online are more chipper than shopping in the shops, the online shops have nearly all the kinds of things ,it provides them more choices, what more, it also save them a lot of time. And now, we can know that nearly everyone have one mobilephone,it makes us feel that the distance didn't far awary,we can talk to others who in the distance which can only through writing in the past. As the TV products, people can know what happen in the world in soon time or enjoy the interesting programs.
In my opinions, every coins has two sings, we can not  ignore the bendiness of the digital products, but we should pay more attentions to its negative influence,because some people are lost themselves in the computers or use the digital products to do some illegal things. So we should our best to make full use of the digital products.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 9966e59e-7d49-3901-a963-c3fb1d49496f> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, the electronic product are changing quickly and apparently. It has
an deep effect on people's life, such as it makes people doing work easier, getting news quicker and so on.
The electronic product has good use in our life, but I have my opinion about it. There is no doubt that The Digital Age has active influence in our daily. However, as sword has two adges, the electronic product also has its weakness. It maybe making us become lazier or even awkward. Sometimes, we may too  rely on it to do things by ourselves. Or we may drop in it likes computer games. So many passive effects coming arround us because of the electronic product.
we should treat it on two aspects, the active and the passive. We can not stop
eating for fear of choking. Instead, We should pay more afford to improve the
quality of electronic product to serve our life.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 4116cb8c-607a-3864-8212-2d9a5b9626f3> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,more and more electronic products apprar in our society.The electronic products make an important role in our daily life because it influence every part in our life.
As far as I am concerned this products can make our life become colourful,because when we feel tired,we can use MP3 to listen  to some music which can relax our body and mental.And we can use the ineternet to find some imformations which are useful for our study.
A coin has two sides,although this products has many advantage and make our life easy,but it can make people become lazy.Many people do not like to go outside,because they can use the internet to buy something which they must use in their daily life,such as,foods clothes books,and so on.
In my opinion,we do not rely on this products,we must do some things which we can do well by ourselves.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 2b207695-30d1-3fa7-8a61-e16c2f9cd253> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
At present,electries goods are more and more popularity.They just become the commodity.With them,people can see the movie anywhere but not only in the cinema.people also can cherk the massage what they want  anytime,anywher but not only in their office.Electries goods change much of our life.Everthing is became advantage by the electries goods.
As far as I'm concented,electries goods is a quantum jump in the modern develop.As the computer for us,It will infect our life deeply and perdurly. But there is a bad phenomenon that more and more students indulge the electries goods even ignore their study.What I want to say for this phenomenon is that everthing can make the good and bad infection as the catling.The key is that we should learn how to control ourself to turn away the electries goods' bad infection and find the electries goods' good infection.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 420d2e50-00f3-34d2-8fd7-6a1821744c7b> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Now,the digital product are more and more,which are go in our life. The digital product have a huge influence in our life in every aspect.Such as the 3G mobile phones and compluter,which are smaller and more useful . The PS2,MP3,MP4,digitalcamera and so on,also full of our life.So,people are more rely to the digital product than before.
As for me,the digital product have two aspect,one is good to us,another is bad for us.Now many students have mobile phones and computers,which are  bad for their study,beacause they don't use them in a right way.But to  a lot of people,the mobile phones and computers'appearence are good for them,what's more,which speed social development.I like to listen to music,watch the NBA and go on line,so I think digital product's appearence can satisfy our metal need.What'important,now is a informational society,computer's popularization develop it.
I believe,as the society'development, digital product will more enrich our life.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID d2972bab-a1da-33d2-b7d0-ff2efa505924> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,the digital conductions are more and more nowadays as our soicity is growing in a very quick speed.And it is no doubt that they have a good effect on all affecpts of our life.
From exmple,as the computer was invented,people's life had a big change,we can work on the computer insteay going to a company,we can look for lots of things that we want to know in a easy way,of course,there are many other things like this we can do on the conputer,and there are also many other digital conductions that help us much in our life.
As for me,I think thought the conductions do much help on our life,people must learn to use them in a right way,or they may be become those things that are harmful for people.What's more,we should do our best to protect those helpful digital conductions.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 9a62cea3-995d-3ee4-818f-09a273af66ef> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,more and more electronic products such as computer and cellphone have come in to our life.Meanwhile, they have play more and more important role in many aspect of our moderm society ,which makes us able to do our work efficiently and enjoy our life. In the meantime, electronic products have also done some harm to our surroundings,such as the pollutions of air and environmental.
In my opinion, through they have disadvantages,but they have more benefits to us,and their short coming can be avoided. So,we should take good use of them rather than afaid and get them far away from us.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID ced2edf4-2d24-3746-8287-0b8b0b850647> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Today, various digital products have turned out in our daly life,they are playing more and more vital part in our life .To contach with someone,we need a mobile phone;to learn about what is going on in the world,it will be better if we have a TV; to search something ,we  should have a computer,the computer is fuctional,we can use it to find many things we want to know,we can use to study on line,we can also communicate with others and so on.all above show that our life become more culorful because of the digital products,it is unimaginable what our life will be for us if we don't have them.
However ,like anything else ,it has two sides,it is unnormal for us to hear that many childern are absored in computer games ,which have a bad effect on both their shudy and health in physical and mental .Long time use of mobile phone will affect our health.
So,we need to balance the advantages and disadvatages of digital products,imptove its advantages and limit its disadvantages.we should make full use of it.The tomorro of the world will be better because of digital products

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 0a046e33-9c3d-352b-a20e-3c0fdf154656> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowsaday,the digital product is more and more.In study,wo should use the computer to learn knowledge;In live,wo should use celllphone to communicate with other;Even in the toliet,people use the auto-wash-system to clean the toliet.So the digital age is coming,a great age is coming.
Since 1946 ,the first computer was invented,our world have increase many kinds of digital age,and it bring great influent to people's life.From study to family,from communicate to play,that all full with digital.And we find it that we can't leaf digital product even one second,without it,we may not be do anything.The digital product is become more and more important.
In my opinions,the digital product is necessary for us to do many things in this age.If we use digital product in right way ,it can help us a lot,and it will advance the human's development.Opposed,if we use the digital product in wrong way ,it will bring great harm to human being.Though it have almost all people want to live in the safe soicity,but someone don't,they use the digital technology to destory the world.We should augment curb the digital technology,and make it benefit human being.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 71d64261-f9b4-3bcd-927a-4959a3ade64f> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
nowdays,there are more and more electrical products in our daily life.they bring us much convenience
and make us live comfortably.we can study at night with the lights,we can watch tv,play  computer games when we feel bored,we would be relaxed with the help of the washing machine....
however,every coins has two sides.due to the using of electrical products,wo need more resourse and make the environment much worse.the carbon make the earth hotter and hotter.the earth become dying.
in my opinion,we can't live without the electrical pruducts.but to make the earth more healthy ,we must be a good user.we should use the electrical product only when we need,only in this way can make our life be harmony.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 724cd011-f090-353c-81a7-b8898d0f032c> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the develpent of society,the digital produce become more and more.We can see digital perduce everywhere,such as mobile phone,MP4,X-box,and so so.
We can not live without digital produce which relice to every side of our living,we can play games by mobile porduce which can make us relax.some other cna help us to work more easier.We can reply by digital produce that we can go away without cash.and we can communicate with someone who live far away from us by mobile phone.We can make friends by intenet but not face to face.
In my opinion,digital produce is importent to our living,it help us to work,study,trouval,communicate.I believe it is a great creation and it will become better and better.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID b60e962f-df28-364b-8630-d22fd1bdb714> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of society,there are more and more eletricity goods,like TV,MP4,PC, in our life. It is convinient for us to use these digital goods to content with our neccesary and solve our problems,so we always depend on them.
However,ever thing has two coins,the digital age also bring some problems,which influences our life.For one thing,our eyes become more and more weak due to use the eletricity goods too often and too long.For another,People become more lazzy so they have little passion in their job.
In a word,we should use the eletricity goods correctly in the digital age.Only doing this,our life will become more and more beautiful.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 7dd8d089-2a08-3c52-beb2-158388b9c159> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,there are more and more digital products.
Digital products have an great influce in people's lives by many ways,such as telephone mobile,TV,computer,camera.All these digital products help people to link to others and the world ,and make people do things more conveniently.
In my oppion,the digital products have their good impact bad impact.
For example,the Apple'ipad is popular in the world because of it's great entertainment and high technology,which is a digital product between telephone mobile and computer.It can convenience people and release them.It also help people to receive the fresh news from the world. On the controry,it take peoole much time to play it and make people have few time to do sports and get along with others.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID a2a5f15f-97f3-305a-987f-f9a5cf529806> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
There are more and more digital being used in our live since1990s.why?  they are very importen for us to improve our  live equilty.Forexamp,TV can give us information from all over world, computer can send our ideas to every place and give us happyness with the computer games.
We can't imssage how dark a day if the Earth without digital light. The digital give us a light dad as give us a forever morning.we can't leave the digital now.
In my opinion,although digital give us more wonderful experience,we can fount out it's disadvantage.As a computer,we can be happy from games,but most of students are too crazy in the computer game to study.We should make us clear to face the digital macthine, and make better used them.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID a5547eab-6000-37ce-b511-b0ff654f7e98> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As is known to all, more and more digital product have appreed and largely influenced our life.Therefor,we cannot immaging a world without any digital things for this things have a firm connent with our morden life.so why does digital things is so important that we cannot live without them.
First of all,I think,is the function themselves.Our life cannot become so convenient  without them .Secondly ,we can save large amount of energe and time through them.So we can do more things which we in fond of .Lest but not the last,they can accomplish many works which we can not finish.
SO in my opinity,I enjoy these digital things .I hope there will be more and more wonderfull things in the future.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 0c2588fb-0de1-34dd-a519-713e1da3e5a4> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadaya,more and more digital products are produced and used by people according to human requirement,such as notebook,digital camera,microwave oven and so on.Living in the digital age,digital products have been the mose important things in people life.
As we all know,digial products have a great influence of people life on all aspects.Using the digital camera,we can save our great time in the photo which we can review it all the time.Using the mobile phone,we can talk to another people who is far away from us.In general speaking,digital produces bring convenience to us.
In my opinion,for one side digital proucts make our life convenient,for another side digital products make people more lazy than before.For example,people can wash clohes by using washing machine but hands.It makes people more depending on the machine.So i suggest that we should use the digital products reasonably.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID e82363ab-8d15-39e6-a7b3-48e497191b89> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
It is true to say that people creat more and more electronical product with smaller size but more powerful function.We are getting more and more closer to the eletronical product.
On the one hand ,with the rapid development of science,electronical product such as computer has grately changge our live for it make us transform information more quickly and more convenient.Things like mobile phone enable us to connect with other people whenever and wherever.
However,on the other hand,the electronical product also bring us many troble.People seems to use computer not only to work but to play computer games ,which do great harm to their eyes and bring them many other illness caused by using computer for long time a day all year round.Bringing moble phone with you also can do harm to you body.
As far as I am concerned,I think we should make good use of the electronical product,we use them for convenience,but not to be addited to it.Only if we control our time to use them,can we live without the harm of them.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 0ff38e6f-2580-339a-a9ea-a49e0a209938> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowsday,as the science develop fast,the electronic products are become more and more popular in our life .And we can see that all kinds of electronic products around us .
The electronic products make a great influence in all aspects of our life,But it just like a rapier .On the one hand ,we can benefic from it .but on the other hands,it may do harm to us.Do the iphone for example,the iphone has more functions than ohers moblephone ,it can help people easely to make more informations from the internet,besides,we maybe work in the internet from the iphone,in a word,it make our life more comfortable and more scientific.The iphone is benefic to us,but it maybe some disadvantage in it.Because every one want to posses the iphone,but the iphone is too espense for some people,and they can offer the iphone,but they want to have it ,so they use up there money to buy in ,espectly the students.and it do harm to them.
In my opinion,electronic products is good for our life,but we should use it well.So they can bring us benefic.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID b9119ac7-bdff-378c-bf65-fbb5b58a15db> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
nowaday,cellphone,camera,TV,Mp4 and other digital products are articles for daily life.They bring great conviences for human nature.People can communitcate no matter where they are ,how long the distant is .we can get the latest news immediately and take action.Digital products  cover military,economic,politics and dailry life. It makes great impacts on our life and change the history of human being.Digital products makes the big word into a earth village.That a great leap!
howerver , digital prouduct is a double-edge sward.For profit,some people do illegal issues through it .Some people with poor self-control abbility  are addicted to it,which destorying their life .
As citizens ,we are supposed to use them not breaking the law,not to be addicted.Make full use of it to make our life more convient and colourful .

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 38a18877-2bad-3d4b-ac0e-eb2ef1536770> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the economy and science is bomming quikly,people have come in the digital age.According to the TV,every year there are almost thousands of new digital products made in the world! How fast it is to creat a new digital product! Now almost everyone have a cellphone and other digital products,even a 3 years old child can own a MP3 to listen to the music.As you can see ,how many digital products in the world on earth? Nobody can give a ture reply.
Now the digital products are playing a great role in our lives, for example the cellphones,today we can live without a car, but we can not live without a cellphone!because without it we can not do many things,we can call someone to come to the meeting,we can not call the company `s stuffs to do the important things and so on......
On the other hands, the digital products can make a big diffrent on our daily life,everyday we use the computer to chat with friends,everyday we watch TV to know  the new things,every night we use the MP3 to listen to the light music which can help us sleep easily......
As you can see the digital products are so important that we can live without them!
In my oppinion,I conclude that in short: No today`s digital products, no today`s happy life!

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID adb61a4c-b532-3820-8d21-5e79397cc417> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, there are more and more electronic products in our life. In the past,
it's rarely to see the electronic products,such as the MP3,TV,DVD,PC, the cell
phone and so on.
As the economic developed, more and more electronic products were producted and
the price decreased again and again.So the electronic products became common in 		people's life.In the meanwhile , they play a important part int people' life.In
other words,people can't live without the electronic products.For work ,people
must use the PC, a great deal of jobs can't work without PC,such as programmer.
For education , the teacher use the PPT in PC to teach students.For entertainment
people watching TV,playing PC games , surfing the Internet for fun.The electronic
products take a significance in people life.It seems that ,people can't live without
them.
In my opoin, thanks to the electronic products,our life become more fun and more
interesting.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID e9886a26-50b0-3d05-8388-b43b91af69f1> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Recently, as the technolegy developing, a series of digital products have came into our life, for example, camera, phone, and others, saying, they not only give us convenient, but also bring us some troubles.
Everyday, we talk with our family by phone, play the game by computer, and using other electronics products. These push us around a word full of radiotion, which may improve the rise of getting some diseases, always, the eyes diseases , saying some famous dotors. Taking some examples, more and more tens, even less than 10 years, have moypia and the other eyesach. It not only get themselves fell troubles but also their pareents, so, more and more parents and dotors say pushing the children away the computer and other digitals is must.
In my opinions, we should sure the things that the electronics products bring to us, but also, we should not sold ourselves to them, lose ourselves.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID ea3dfeb1-5907-36c6-8b31-fcc2e4f3b5e2> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the science and technology growing, the digital products are used popularly by persons. In daily life, people live with kinds of digital products. We are in the digital age.
Digital products changed our lives a lot in all sides.Like using a cellphone, people can get in touch with each other no matter how far apart from each other, taking photos with a camera, people can save the nice momery in pics that they can remind it after some years,and so on.
However, every corn has two sides, digital products bring some bad things to us too, for examples, the radiation from the cellphones will do harm to health, also the telemarketing might anoy you.
All in all, it is no doubt that digital products makes our life more convinient.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 55b92e59-8a3e-318e-b797-9ce4644a0fcf> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Today,as the technology develops,more and more electronic products come to our life.
And now it also play an important role in our life.
Electronic products make our life convenient,in our daily life,we know what happen yesterday through the TV,and we wash our clothes by washingmachine,we communicate with our friends or parents through mobie phone.And we also learn knowledge through electronic products.For instance,in the class,the teacher teaches us through PPT or movies about what we would learn.And we can know almost anything through a computer connect to the Internet.
I think electronic products have a positive influence on our life.It turns the way we live,it bring us convenience.However,we also need to notice the bad things it bring.For example,some people always watch TV and play computer games all the day at home,they do not go out to make friends or to do sports.It is bad for us to use electronic products like that.We should use them to make our life better.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID c83b1fae-615f-39ef-8db9-cda8489fc816> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, the new digital innovation is appeared increasingly. In fact, more than a new product is put to market in every minute. No doubt the digital age is drawing.
The digital innovation makes a great difference in our daily life. For study, it can makes our learning more efficient. A large number of electronic dictionary are around us. For work , because of the digital ,the complicated work is more and more simply. For life , they change our sense of happiness and the traditional view of life.
As far as I’m concerned, we can’t live without the digital innovation. It’s worth remembering how valuable for our surrounding are the benefit that they has brought us.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID d38a6345-59ff-3e25-9957-9407403acfd2> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
eventcally,the digital products become more and more comment ,people'slife are fill with some products like iphone ipad and note book.Whenever you are in a public place ,you can see some people playing games with these product.
On one hand,digital product have made significant influnce in all aspects of our life.It appear in our kitchen ,in our living room and all kind of public place.It can be use to save a person's life,it can be use to cooking fastly,it can be use to navigation.So nowaday if the digutal product  disapper suddently,our world will become confusion immediately .On the other hand all this will do harm to us with its radiation,sometimes it can even make us have caner.
So in my opinion ,human can't live without digital product ,but we can't use it so frequently so as to prevent it harm us .In addition,before we use it ,we should understand the correct use of it to make it hramless

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 67168a90-5fec-33c4-b55f-b3bbb4cec0bd> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the world develops more and more fast,our life changes more and more fast,and digital industry develops more and more fast,we can use a cellphone talked with somebody or sent a message several years ago ,after that,we can wacthed movies or listened songs by a cellphone ,however,the functions of cellphone in this time,are not only communicating or palying some lower games,but also getting your position,receiving and sending an e-mail,playing online games and many new functions.
What's more, we can dress a cloth that was washed a moment ago,our camera can take photos which are much more clear than the camera in years ago.Our television and computer can help us much more than before.The change of digital time changes everyone of human beings.It's a new time, a time makes our life get better.It's the digital time.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 353b5398-5cfb-3284-81f5-9bb784caf237> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
There are many digital ages in the market.We can choose different digital ages for what we need.There are really many goods in different prices and functions so it's sometime difficult for us to choose one of them.Even every high student have a mobile phone.
When we are on the bus or subway,we can usually see someone listening to the music with his iphone or watching movies with an ipad.when in class,many students would put out their iphone to chat with others or playing games.As a result,they could't do well in their examation.The digital age really changes our lives very much.
As far as I'am concerned,the digital age colours our lives a lot.We will never feel board on the bus and we can it brings us more entertainments in our lives.For us students,we should use the digotal age in a right way and make our lives full of happiness .

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID a4da504e-2fb0-359b-91a6-f1d022e4d399> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays , digital products , such as computers , DVs , digital cameras , MP5 players and so on ,  are widely used . With the development of information technology , more and more digital products are making rapid progress .
The digital products have a great effect on people's work and life. With the computers, our work becomes much easier . Some work that used to be performed outdoors can now be done in the office. And it help a lot in our studies , improving our ability of studies such as English lisenting and do well in other . In other way, DVs and cameras can make our life more colorful and meaningful. With a digital camera, we can take pictures of every memorable moment or use a camera to record it.
In my opinion , our society has entered a digital age and I believe more and more digital products will be created in the future, and they will continue to have a great impact on us . It will take a important role in our future.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 7e481753-5a59-3cb3-b6ce-c181dde1f084> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the economic development,there are more and more Electronic products appearing in the market.
In fact,those Electronic products had made a great impact in our daily life and made our more colorful。For example，we can chat with other who not here by moblie phone or we can get closer with the world by surfing the internet。
As a student and adolescent,i would thack to the Electronic products because we can learn the class more efficient by Multimedia teaching.Besides,i can absorb more knowledge which can no get in the class from the computer,and so on.It is not doublt that with digital age coming,we are live in a convenient and colorful life.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID f59ffa9a-a65d-3ee3-b924-14a5156efe3f> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the technology develops,more and more digitial products are on sale nowadays.On the same time,the speed  of its development becomes faster and faster.
As we can see,the digitial products make some differences on many aspects of our lives.For example,more and more people have their own mobile phones so they can contact with others conveniently.Besides,people like going travels with a digitial camera in order to retain their happy time.What's better,we don't need to worry about if we will go the wrong ways or be missing besause of the GPRS positioning system.However,every coin has two sides.Telemarketing ,identity theft and some other things also brings our lives inconvenience even dangers.Take an example,in the holiday some students recieve some messages which tells them their bank account are innomaland ask the students send their money to a safety account.In fanially,the students are cheated.
In my opinion,people should use the digitial products properly and the lows of proper using the digitial products and the punishments of cheated should be made.Every thing shoule make a good use of them so they can make our lives better.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 3537b28b-fa04-3b35-83e1-f4fd9d1e8f1b> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of tecnoleage,more and more digital producation are been used in our daily life .their is no doubt that it has a great influence on us .on one hand .with the help of digital production we can do something moer easy than  befor we can chat with friends fromall over the world eventhough we haven't meet each other .we can take a wonderful picture with a camer.what's more ,we can stay at home sothat wecan feel better in summer because of the air condition .
on the oter hand ,some consumer may not relised that too much use of them can also do hame to us ,some yong people suffer on the internet beyond control ,which causes a lot of problems .even worse,we spent too much time in play comeputer games that we don't have enough time to do our busness.which is of great of hamre to our socity .
as far as i'm concern ,we should use them properly to improve our quantityof life but never go the extend .

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 7e22f7cb-d441-304b-b894-26e26c02d082> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,more and more digital products are produced to change the world.There is no doubt that they make a very big difference including advantage and disadvantage to us .Especially,as the coming of the 21th century,the developing of digital machines tend to the climax.But we can not only pursuing their quantity,but also should pay more attention to their quality.
Maybe digital machines sometimes bring big trouble to us,but i still stick to giving a good expression to them because they really exist lots of good influence for the world.For example,as a matter of lamp,our world can be lighted.Due to the computer,we can get more unfamiliar knowledge from other countries.
Pursuing more new tenology for human is not only endless but also necessary.Without these products,human just only live in the past.No light,no knowedge,and no enjoyment.We need progress,success and everything which make our world better.That is why we survive in the world.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID fb6d3ea1-b7d6-3469-8f4e-d6ccaf64a0e1> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, more and more digital productions,such as television computer mp3 and so on, were used widely.There is no doudt that we are living in the digital age and digital productions are playing more and more important role in our daily.
In my mind,the effect of digital productions both have advantages and disadvantages.For one thing,information searching is not a tough work with the help of all kinds of searching engines.We can contact with our friends or bussiness partners though we can't meet each other.For another,their disadvantage is obvious.In the first place,the digital productions cost much time money and energy especially for those with less self-control.In the second place,using digital productioons for a long time harms the eyes a lot.Last but not least,more and more young people are addicated to playing computer games,surfing online and so on,which are not useful for their future develoment.
All in all,we can't get away from the digital age.The most important thing we should do is making good use of them.If we do it well,they will be better for us.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 6dbab79b-3b61-324c-862d-0650a14acd95> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
In recent years,there is an inceresing number of people pay more and more attention on electronic product, which is changing our life in all the aspects.
With the development of the technology, the electronic product has been more and more digital, which has been an important part of our life, such as telephone. Nowadays, telephone take a significant role in our daily life, and it has turned into a powful machine, maybe we could not only call it "machine", but also a "assistment" . it's a good assistment because it helps us do many things, which save our time.
In my view, electronic product is good for us but it also brings some problems because some people use it too ofen and they can not concentrate on their own job. We should use it in the right ways, and make our life more colorful.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 0d586ba0-b86c-38b4-baf6-1a1f5f2ce09a> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of the science ,more and more electrical products has been arised in our life ,like mobilephone ,mp5 etc.and they are as an important part in our daily life.
In most of the life, we need electrical products.like the telecommunication,which is the essential activity ,we need the mobilephone or the computer ,let alone those complicate work.
As far as I am concerned,every coin has two sides .On one hand,electrical pruducts make our life convenience ,some difficult things we didn't used to do by ourselves ,like washing the clothes by washing machine ,up to the high building by elevater.On the other hand,it all make us lazy and always depend on it.When without it,we can't do a thing quickly,even to cook meals.So,i suggest people should use the electrical products appropriately.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID c116229e-25b6-3cad-b2ec-994c87151de3> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As devolping of the science,there are more and more electronic products we can use in our life.
This situation effects our life in many ways.On one hand,it makes our life become more convenient.For example,because of the computers,we can get the news in time,and the mobile phones also make us can contact with our familes and friends no matter where we are.But,on the other hand,a part people don't think so,they think because of the computers,more and more people become addicted to the computer games,and then,they communicate less with their friends.And other people think that the privacy has become increasingly fragile in a world of linked databases.
In my oppion,maybe there are some bad influence about the electronic products,but the most important is that they make our life become better than before.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 68be4dfa-4791-3407-a3a5-20d934d1015f> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,the society is guadually entering the digital age.Varieties of electronical productions which contain comouters,mobile phones ,TVs and so on turn up in people's lives.
These digital products bring people a new and fashional life way.In work,they provide more convenience technology for workers to complete their complex tasks in a effective way.In study,students can also benefit from the digital ones' intergrated information so that they can learn knowledge deeper and broader.In life ,colourful life's styles are brought by electronical products,too.People can get fun and relax by using the productions to play games,listen the music ,see the movies and reading.In a conclusion,these digital manufactures have a great effect on our daily lives and they colour our lives very much.
As far as I am concerned,as if everyone can correctly control to use the digital products,they can show the giant advantages to the human beings.No matter how many disadvantages they possess,we have to admit that current people are impossible to live without the digital products.So let us have a good use of them and let them contribute most to our human beings with their powerful functions.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 9141c03a-2006-37da-a776-fd9075f9865c> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowday,there are more and more electronic products which we can be choose in the marker.
And they make great effects on all aspect of the human life ,for example ,we use the mobile phone to communicate with our friends or family and we use computer for study or for fun. Now we can not live without electronic products.
Though it make our life more colourful and  provide us convenience. However, it has many drawbacks . First, it will influence our study when we use them for fun frequently. Second, they will hurt our eyes when we face the sceen for a long time. Thirdy, we will lost much time for outdoor activities if we concentrate on watching TV ,playing computer games and mobile phone.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 5bc83525-2a6f-36bf-bc51-3136d335fbad> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Thanks to the rapid development of science and technology, more and more digital products are available nowadays.People use mobilephones for cinnection,PCs for working and entertainment, digital cameras for taking photoes and MP4 for listening to songs or see movies.In a word people are surrounded by digital products now and Actually people enter the digital age.
As a result, digital products insert great effect on every aspect of people's daily life.On the one hand, people's ilfe become increasingly colourful and convenient due to digital products. For instance, people can see a film almost everywhere after the occurance of MP4. On the other hand, someone use digital products to do harmful things such as identity theft.
On my perspective of view, digital products are like a swor with two sides. Thus, people should treat the digital age rationally. Only in that way can digital products serves people properly.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 6bd0e3bb-313e-3de4-a932-2ae969dfd5f5> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Today more and more electronic products advent in our eyes with the fast  technology
development,such as phone ,Ipad,mp3.4,and so on.
In fact,electronic products change our life a lot,with which not one would disagree.
Fisthand,the electronic products make our dayly life became convenient,Like the phone and
digital camera by which we can be easy to take a photo and talk with others any where .
On the other hand electronic products also make we feel more happy and colorful in our life .Because we can lisent music ,play game by these electronic products in wherever and whenever.However,electronic products are not aways good for us .Many electronic products mill bring evelement polution.
As for me ,we should treat electronic products reasonably.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 30ca2796-c40d-31e8-9020-97cc9a653ec0> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,more and more electronic products are full of our lives,it is almost impossible without them in our daily lives.
As we all know,elecronic products make a very important role in our daily lives in many aspects.Take me for an examle,now,I get up with my cellphone in the morning all the time.
And then I will surf the internet to know news and something interesting.besides,cellphone is getting more and more fashionable and can be used to playing games, watching movies and so on.As a student, computer is very thing in my life.I can find the imformation in the internet,see a movie and chat with my friends,so it is a part of my life now.
In my opinion,though electronic products make our lives more comfortable and convenient but we can't be in the charge of them rather than make our lives more colorful.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID d6836776-86eb-3165-9897-12343504a661> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all kwon,with the development of the technology ,we are now living a life surrouding with all kind of Electronic products.
Electronic products have really have a great effection on our daily life.It brings us convenience.Like mobile phone,it helps us that we can communicate with our families and friends easily in a long distant.In our home,like Air conditioning makes people feel comfortable and the refrigerator makes our food clean.Besides,like game machines can entertainment both children andadults.In a word,human being can'nt live with Electronic products.
Every corn has two sides,Electronic products also has his disadvantages,like making people drive off game.SO,i think people should treat Electronic products in a wise way.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID ac6a1ba9-f523-3df8-853f-58eafdca5322> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the rapid development of the technology，the electronic products have became diversified.
It's no doubt that those electronic products have made our life more convenient.For example，the mobile phone allow us to have a talk with those who is not around us.What's more ，we can enjoy the music wheneverand wherever we want with a Walkman. However，every thing has two sides.Electronic products also have their disadvantages.Most of them will release radiation which do harm to our health.what's the worst is that we have became more and more dependent on them.Many people just stay at home and connect with others by throughing the Internet.That means It has isolated some of us from the real world.
From my point of view，we should use Electronic products properly.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 33f0f3c3-fda8-3f6e-adf6-ca1a8fe95589> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,there are a lot of electronic products in our life.It means we have enter a new digital world.
In recent years,There are more and more elecrtronic products in our life.For example,when you go for a trip,you need a camera to keep the wonderful memory.when you miss someone who is in the distance,you need a phone or a computer to get connection with him.when you are boring,you can watch TV.The above these all can prove that electronic products play an important role in our daily life.
In my view,there is no doubt that elecrtronic products bring us a lot of convenience.But everything has two side,the elecrtronic products such as computer and mobile phone kill us a lot of time.At the mean time,they make our sight weak.so i advise we should know the advantages and disadvantages of elecrtronic products so as not to lose ourselves in the digital age.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 8a2a8f99-1ae5-38df-945d-b0c24f14aa0c> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowaday,as the technology devoloped,more and more electronic products has come into our lives.For example,MP3,PSP,mibile phone,they all are come to our lives in several years.
These eletronic products make a very huge change to our daily lives.At pass,we hard to conmunicate with others betweet two who are in a distance.But mobile phone makes it easy.We can tall to others wherever and whenever.It shorts people's heart.Also,electronic products' fuction is stronger as time go by.
In my oppinion,the devoloping of eletronic products is a very good thing for our daily.Because it makes our lives more convinience.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 55228df9-359b-3ea6-a0e1-5b18ed969abb> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the advance of society, there are more new matters run into our viewing, the most obvious of one is the digital products. Doubtlessly, digital products is increasingly developing in our life.
As all we can feel, digital products make a difference in many aspects of life. Such as mobile phone, it changes strongly people's approaches of communication, people can touch with there friends or family ealily.Besides, digital products devolop our life level, we can use many tools to cook, to wash cloth, to receive news and so on. All above is the advantages of digital products.Inetitably, it also takes some bad influences to us. For example, we know that the car gives our many conveniences for working or travling, but it makes environment changes worse and worse because of its improper letting of offgas, and there are many products cause the same mistakes at the same time.
In my personal point, the digital age is the advance period in the human age, although its devoloping takes some mistakes, this circustance will change in the future. we should accept this advance life and try to make it better and better.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID dcfd262c-aab5-3433-a272-38d2d0f2e671> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,more and more digital products come into our life.The sheer number of digital productscan make you dazzle.
Therefore,digital products pay a important role in our life and make us different in every way.For instance,computer change human's daily life.Many peoples don't go to outside as they just click the mouse in front of the computer screen that they can konw all kinds of  the imformations and get something they want.
In my opinion,every coins have two sides,so do the digital product.In one hand,digital product brings us a lot of convinience and lead us a beautiful life with materials.In the other hand,digital product  influence peoples' life in deep.It makes people lack of communications so that the society will become more and more individual.The radioation from the digital product can do harm to us--many teenagers have poor eyesight because of the computer.Besides,the constant and rapid innovation of digital product also confuse plenty of peoples.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID bd2d3ab0-aa94-3851-b183-b3f2c5db7961> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowdays,more and more digital products are produced in the world.Digital products have a great influent on people's life and people's life depend on digital products deeply.
Every year the various of  new digital product are invented.So many people are atracted by  the function of it.Take the cellphone for a examole,peaple all over the world is carzy the iphone,because it is designed perfectly.Besides,a lot of people change the digital products for entertainment and enjoy,such as PSP.
In my oppion,I think the digital products are make our life convenient and perfect,but it also have bad influent on our life.The ma-- made the digital product is a white pollution for the enviroment.We can see the old digital products anywhere.It is a great pollution.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 74802bbf-71c0-3606-94db-7589a2030f36> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,by appearance of different digital productions,human's life have lots of changes.
First of all,digital productions make people'life more and more convenient,like washing machine ,it can deal with our dirty clothes that we can save our time to do other things...what's more,digital produtions can close the distance from us,like i-phone,we can talk with our friends or familys whenever you want,or we can chat with our net friend anytime by a software.
Is digital production beneficial for human?different people have different opinions,as far as I am concerned,we can benfit from it by making use of it in a proper way,thus,when we are learning and studying,we can use the net by computer to find the learing information to improve ourselves.on the contrary,if we always use computer to playing games,thus,we could
not gain anything except failures.
All in all,if we use digital productions in a proper way that we can gain benfits.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID c903b035-f07e-3156-bb99-3f9822b211b6> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,more and more electronic productions have appearanced arround us.
We have more choices to select what we want and what we need.
Apparently,electronic productions have make great influences in our daily
lives.For example,we can use camera to take photos,many children enjoy themselves
in the PSP,almost every family have a computer.Besides,there are TV,air conditioning,
freezer and so on in our families.They make our lives more convenience and wanderful.
For my personal point of view,I believe that electronic productions are good for
us and make our lives more convenience.However,it doesn't mean that we should get them the more the better.Because most of them are not cheap.It could be a huge budget to a poor family.Moreover,Some fashion students may used their credict cards to buy many expensive electronic productions.That way seems like waste money and it must be impolicy.
So,in my opion,only when it's necessary,we buy electronic productions.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 7e5583c1-2be3-3a92-afb4-36121e7aa7ac> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of techologic, more and more electronic products have been used in our life,and we  can not live without them.
The electronic ptoducts make a diffenerce for our life. For example, we can chat with our friends by mobile phone when we do not get toghther.And we can get some imformations that we need by the internet .But they also have some disadvantage factors. For instance , today ,there are many people who stole others persenal imformatians by internet ,mobile phone and other ways.And many teenager are indulge in computer games so that their studies are worst.
In my oppoin, the electronic products are a shrpe sword, we should take good use of them to make our life more and more beautiful. On the other hands ,we will do harm to others and ourselves if we can not make good use of them.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID c96a1b55-3ff2-3c89-818e-1cada4510c80> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the technology growth,all kinds of digital products have been created and be used in our daily life.
Digital product has made our life diffrence,for example,when I want to invite my friend to go to a concert together,I can call him by using my phone,but if the phone has not been created,I can only invite him face to face.So convenient the digital produce is!
As far as I am concerned,digital product is very halpful for us,it makes our life more happiness,work out the quetions more easily.And with the technology growth,I believe that our life will become more better.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID bc5e4df1-5842-37c3-862c-cfc0878adfc5> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,as the ecenomic progress,more and more digital product are fill with our lives.Because of that,we suffer a lot of problems in many ways when we live in a digital age.
First,we most communicate with others by mobilephone or online,because we think it is convenient.But it don't let us focus on our daily lives and real society communication.Second,when people spend lot of time on mobilephones and computers,they will feel unconfortable even get sick.Last but not least,after a digital product is finished,it has used many sourses.And lot of digital products can't be recycle.
In my opinion,digital products are playing an importment part in our lives and wo can live without them.But we should think about the problems they has bronght and how solve them.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID ef5d2c5c-fc32-31db-9f38-9944e068760f> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the great achievement of morden science quickly progressing,more and more electronic products are coming in our life.These advanced products have a deep impact on people's all kinds of aspects in their life.
At the same time,the electronic products not only make people's daily life become more and more convinient,but also make the distance between people and people become closer.As we know,in 2010,APPLE company produced the most advanced electronic product--iPhone 4,from then on,people's way of daily life is changed.For example,people prefer to use iPhone to read the news or books rather than purchase newspaper or go to the bookstore,people prefer to use iPhone to teach or learn more about knowledge on the Internet everytime and everywhere rather than use computer at home to learn.And an important function in this electronic product callde "facetime",it can let you see and talk to a person you want in the distance, whatever where he is is so far away from where you are,that's amazing!
In my opinion,I do think that the electronic product makes a great advantage in our life.It's very convinient in people's way of shopping,purchasing and chatting on Internet.In other words,the electronic products are leading our future to become more and more beautiful!

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID ebdf6e99-9b17-3bf3-ab05-dd785e8ae0f9> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of technology,we are entering the digital age,the we are exposed to diffierent kinds of digital products,such as digital TV,digital camera,digital washing mashine and so on,which have made great influence on us.
What the digital products have influenced our life?First of all,these modern digital products offer us a more convenient life than before. For example, the digital camera makes it possible to delete or correct the “unsuccessful” photo of ours, which was impossible with the traditional camera. While, unfortunately, these fashionable digital items have cultivated a generation more isolated from the real life. It is hard to imagine that a man so accustomed to the digital mobile on-line chatting can be capable of the practical communication with others. Finally, too much dependent on the digital things, human seem to be more indifferent to the real world, which we, though reluctant to admit, have to accept.
As a result, as the generation assailed by all kinds of digital miracles, we might as well initiatively avoid some of them despite efficiency and comfort they can supply. Don’t forget those old days when you were going to visit an old school friend though there would be a long train journey, which, in today’s digital era, has been thoroughly replaced by the digital on-line chatting.
As far as I'm concerned,as the old saying goes,there's two sides of the coin.But from what has discussed above,we can safely draw the conclusion that,the advantage outweigh the disadvantage of the digital products.Because the world is becoming more and more beautiful with the digital age.We are happy and harmony in life and work.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 83d0cf48-1a5f-36a6-acb7-6bb2ffc8ad61> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the techlege developed, nowadays many electronic products arise, playing an important role in our life.
People get more choices to solve their problems with all kinds of electronic products. Take shopping as an example, people can go shopping by phone, computer at home in stead of going outside to the shop.
The more convience the products bring to us, the further people rely on them. So personally speaking, I think that we should use the electronic products in a scient way, so that we have no measures without them.
Take the previous example, we should still learn how to buy things in the real world, using our Language expression. Not just learning how to open the webside and click the mouse. If the store near us is more convience, we should get outside going shopping instead of buying it by phone. We should not lose the choice that getting touch with the people around us. We should not lose the ablities such as language expression that we should have had.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID ff8c1db5-95f2-3a6b-801c-10c419101464> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
In modern society,electric product do play a necessary role in human lives.And every time its amount keep growing ,seem no way to reduce.
The electric products make a great difference in every aspects of human society, even explode a mental battle that people have never experienced. Like the cigeratte can destory people's health, some electric products can damage the host's mental and even phsical health. Computer, a well-known and universial electric product, now is thought of as a severe wound to the adolesents. Many of them fall in a deep hole, play computer game day and night, and it seem totally impossible for them to find the exit and recover.
Also there are many other examples faced to humen that the electric product cripple its owner. Cellphone as a killer who slowly kills people with radiation. Battery as a theif who steal the clean river.
In my view,how to reduce the use of electric products is a not a question any more, it's a obligation that we have to tackle at present.
On the basis of not hindering the society's deveelopment, we should try our best to end up our dependence to electric products, return the blue sky, the clean eyesight,and the healthy soul of ourselves.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID b7f04093-864a-3956-a377-9fee0bcdc641> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
nowaday,digital product has become more and more popularity with people ,undoubtly,digital
product bring us a lot of convience ,like Tv that can show us what happen in the world and give us a lot of enjoy and telephonet that can make people which far away keep touch ,which has been widely use long long ago .and now ,there are more and more digital product come to our life ,like computer ,ipad ,psp and so on,whichi make our life more colorful and wonderful
Digital product has play an importan role in our daily life .Take computer for example ,it can show you many things happen in the world ,wonderful or sadly.and by using the communicating software ,you can keep touch with people far away from you ,even in forgein country ,also ,it can let you talk face to face,how wonderful it is .By using computer ,you can search almost information you want to get ,how convinent it is .The ditital product  make such a convience in our daily ,while it has come to some problem.For example ,some people ,especially young people falls into love with compute games and can quit it ,which lead to the drop of their study .Obviously,in our life ,people overdepend on digital product ,which let some physician functions back down.and if let people leave all of the digital products,they may feel nervous and upset .
As far as I'm concerned  ,  digital product do good more than harm in our life .To some extent ,the harm ,which the digital product bring ,can be avoided .And ,the digital product can do more and more good in our life.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID d42ef6ec-d156-32b6-9ea7-e8454af2ea9c> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Mowadys,with the technology developing fastly,we are go into the digital age.there are more and more elecronic products producted.
All we know,the elecronic products play a important parte in our life,and effert each side in our daily life.Now we are can not lived without elecronic products.Such as computer,it convinences for us to closed to the  world,if we have some questions,we can obains the answer from it.Another,the modolphone,whereve you are,wheneeverthe time,we can call someboby.And so on.We can obains a lot of advantage from it.\
in my oppinion,although the elecronic products brings us convinence,everything has two sides,it make no differences brings us disadvanage.such as the children have not stop playing computer games,and many people take phone too long and so on.
So,in the digital age,we learning lots of knowlege, also we are

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 4050b7d0-b40a-3df5-9ab5-203c54a69dfd> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the booming of the economy as well as the remarkable imoprovment of people's living    standard. More and more ditital age was invented and used around the world such as  IT production ,mobile phone and so on .
Nowdadys, we have advanced science and technology to produceall kinds of digital ages ,and they doing great effects on our life . To some extent, such things add much flavor to our daily life. In recent years,we found ourselves can't left computer and mobile phone. For excample, the Iphone becoming more and more popular ,and it can show the phenonemon well. As I said,the digital age give us a lot of interest, we can use them to relase oursleves,and search for some news or information. For another thing, it also give us somt negative effect, many students use computer and pad to play games amazly, which transfer their energy form study and work. What'more,many people use some advanced device to do some illegal activities,they hurt other peolple's privacy which greatly hurt social safety and economy, and it has aroused wide public concern.
In my opinion, such invention is great in any case. Though we can use them in negative parts,we can use them in positive parts,and I believe the latter is much more than the former. I  hope that the government and school as well as parents should lead children to use the idgital age in a right way.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 86d03e93-1e1b-3b9b-a8ab-b254d738bfaa> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Looking at the last days,the increasing number of electronic equipment are coming into our daily life,as high rate develop of science and technology as well as our incresing demand to a better life.
The new,convenient electronic equipment do make the change to our life of any aspect. The initial purpose of the product of the electronic equipment,is to make people's life more wonderful and convenient.It dose work,but the wrong use of them,bring some probrems.
With TV,some addicted to the TV seres;with computers,some play computer  games or indulge in the virtual;last but not least, with the smartphones,so many peole ignore the people around them,just get on well with their phone.
In my word,the digital age is inevitle,and electronicequipment is full of our life.Though they seem like guilty that make our life boring,they are totally innocent that with their own function.The core is how we treamt them and how we use them.Using them in the correct way ,control them but not control by the electronic equipment,I believe that our life must be more fntastic.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID a4f8e081-c1e0-3788-a0f5-9472048cfcc0> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
How do you think about the digital age?
I think the digital age is very important and useful for us.such as  computer is very useful for us. Country can uses it to build social connections,we can use it make a lot of friends and reach much knowledge,we also can ask the help or question the answer and play computer games for relaxed.
Although computers are bad for us some time,but I think it is gond for us most time.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 8a4a9388-9d72-3934-a31a-cfaba9ba547b> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,With the rapid development of science and technology ,
more and more electronic products appeared in our life.Electronic products became our necessities .Electronic products to the people all aspects of life has very big effect .For examples,the computer to our influence is very big.We have a computer can online shopping,can online movies.It makes our lives very convenient.The mobile phone is more and more important in our life as well as .
In my oponion,electronic products is very convenient and fashion.But just as a saying goes:every coin has two sides.The electronic products make us become  more lazy.Somebody is  probably  addicted to  some electronic products.Because electronic products'temptation is very big to us.
In a word,the electronic products have advatages and disadvatages.Everyone must learn to use it correctly.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 3af3bb80-a0ce-3b70-83b3-a9e07bbfa503> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, there is more and more digital produce in our life. Such as computer, digital camera… The big success of iPad 3 hit stores shows us that we’re in the digital age, and we can’t live without the Digital.
Speaking of Texas，Apple will NOT be putting up a temporary store at SXSW in Austin this year according to the The Austin American-Statesman.I have remembered that Apple built a temporary Store at the event that coincided with the launch of the iPad 2.So I realized that the digital has a big performance in our daily life, and it can influence us in so many ways.
In my opinion, the invention of digital is a big progress in science and human beings. It helps us live a better life. Many things become much more easier because of the digital. So I think it’s our fortune to live in the digital age.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 82cfbddf-9745-3cf7-ad1e-5fb95ee18aa1> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the technology is improveing,more and more digital products could be seen in our daily life.Such as cell phone,laptop,all of then have maken a big affect to different area in our life.For exmple,we can connect with others with our cell phone at anywhere and in anytime,it is easier and faster then writing a letter or useing the telephone at home.Also,with a laptop,we can suring in the Internet out-door and finish our business easily.So digital products make a big different for our daily life.
However,in my humble opinion,digital products are a blade with two edge.I can't agree more that digital products have maken our life more convenient.But them also give us a lot trouble.The most remarkable trouble is that the video game machine,who is the member of the family of the digital products,has maken bad affect to the kids.The kids who addict to playing video game can't focus on their study and most of them have a bad eye sight.
So,I think digital products is not only a helpful thing in our life but also a dangerous thing to our life.As a result we must learn how to use them well as an order to make them help ue more and harm us less.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID c0b69ef3-fe03-380a-b4a2-84851fe2b471> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
When the computer was created , the digital age was coming . Lot's of digital production was created and make our life colorful such as MP3 , camera , mobile phone . I think that more and more digital production is good , because it can make our life convence too . We needn't wait for other's letter and worry about the letter was lost because we have e-mail now . We can find someone no matter where we are and when now is , the mobile phone make the connection easily . When you want to save some beautiful sight , you need't take lot's of time to draw it , because camera can save it in a short time . AT last , we should't rely on the digital production .

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID df017b18-32ee-3f01-8d91-19b651dba55f> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,more and more electronic produces come into our life.Some of them like computes,mobile phones,televisions,cameras even play a very improtant part in our life.
Electronic produces helps us a lot,not only in life,but also in study.It's convinent for students  to do their homeword,search information on internet,or share their learning materials by computes.Electronic also helps people keep in touch easily.In the ancient time,people write letters to sent message,it took a long time.But now,fewer people write letters,we use mobile phones to talk to someone who isnt around us,we can also use computes to get connected with them.Electronic produces entertain our life.We watch tv to get some latest news,releae ourself from the pressure life.
In my opinion, electronic produces enrich our life,but they also limit us.We use a lot of time on electronic produces so that we have fewer time to get together with our families and friends.They lead us lsolate from the social life.All in all,electronic produces have easied our life,but also destroyed our social life.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 05d1fcd5-0210-3548-8b0b-f1e8aa65be8b> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
In the modern day,there are more and more electrical production.People use it more frquently.
The electrical productio make a big influence in our daily life.For example,we can talk with
mobile phone,we can photo use camera,we can slove some difficult task in computer,we also can
listen music by our MP3.People can't live without electrical production.
In my opptnion,electrical production is like the two sides of the coin.One side,it let our
life more convinent.the other side,it also cause some problems.As more and more electrical prodution product,people become more and more lazy,and we become weaker.People always communicate
with phone or internet instead of talking face to face,they are lonely.As technology develop,the
electrical production is updating frquently,it may harm our earth.
In today's digital age,the electrital production is important,but how to use it in a current
way,is what we should learn.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 2b3b2f40-e3e5-352f-9e3b-dead815e5650> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowaday,electronic products have become a part
of our life,especially in the field of entertian-
ment.Nomatter where you are,electronic products
are with you.When you are waitting bus,you may s-
urfing by the cellphone. When  you are do some sh-
opping,you may listing mp3 as well. Even when you
are on the bed, panel computer will be there for
so interesting game.
As time goes,this development may break down the
relationship between people because we spend less
and less time on communicating with others. It go
so fast more than we can image. What we do is take
advantage of them but controled by them. We need
some time to get rid of the depend on electronic
product.We wake up by the sunshine,walk on the be-
autiful street,breath the fresh air,chat with our
friend and family. At that matter,i want to show
some opinion on our cellphone because it ruin our
live as i think. There is an annoying voice come
form cellphone,where you are? i lost my freedom by
them. And what is worse, many people enjoy live with
there cellphone.when apple make siri a real,it creat
a new start as people say. May be it is not a bad
design,but using in  the cellphone is a very point.
It make cellphone more and more clever,and user more
and more foolish.
how i wish go back to the age without so many annoy-
ing thing.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID a3103b40-06a7-33ed-b51a-b422a77b5be5> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Today, with the development of digital technology, more and more digital
product enter our dailylife and become one of the essential part. We can see
people use digital products everywhere, they use cellphone for entertainment when
waiting or in the metro, they lisent music with ipod when they are jogging, they
surf on Internet with ipad whenever they need...
As we can see, digital products have a huge impact on our dailylife when can't
live withour digital product no matter in wort or killing time, i won't regard it
as some negative phenomenon, because it is doomed to happend with the development
of technology----digital products make people's lives more and more convenient.But
at the same time, many people wree over rely on digital products or even addicted
to them in a diseased state because they are too powerful, this phenomenon, which
make many expert worried, should not be ignored.
In my opinion, digital products are powerful and make our life more an more convenient
, but we should not over rely on them.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 23a04019-ce14-3361-8ba8-8be11268fe0d> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, there are more and more electronic products in our life. We cound surf the Internet  , watch TV and we use phone every time.  Electronic products make oru life more convenient .
There are many instrances can prove it . For one thing, the computer chang our life and make our life more special. For example ,we can shopping online but needn't go to the stroe to buy something what we want . Also ,we can get knowledge from is . For anther thing , TV make our home more happy. We can watch TV with our families so that we can have more time stay with ore families . Last but not least, telephone is necessary for us. We use it everyday and we can chat with our friends or families in any time whatever how far they far away from us. Electronic products make oru life more convenient and happy.
In my opinion, I support the point that the electronic products make our lif convenient.We use them every day.And I can't imagine that there is no electronic products in our life.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 3d1f757d-96e6-3fe4-a232-e29c665e3dd3> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,by the fast development of technology,more and more digital products are used in our daily lives and we can't already left the digital products to live.
Digital products made a huge influence in our daily lives,for example:cell phone,computer,TV and so on.If wo have not cell phone,wo can't talk with others convinience
and we will lost a good way to communicate with others so that we have not more chances to make friends with others.If we hanve not TV,we will boring in our relaxing time and many  people will lost their job.So,digital products make a huge influence in many ways in our daily lives.
In my opinion,digital products are great inventions of human being.Digital products let our lives more and more convinience.But,every coin has two sides,digital products also bad to us in some way,such as pollution.so we should use digital products in a good ways and we can't so depend on digital products.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 139c8a08-0b7c-3666-b249-91a497ff6bd3> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
for the past few years,more and more electronic product is present to our eyes.Various product become a necessity in our daily life such as working by computer ,communicating by cellphone and so on.In seems to me that the electronic product have influenced our life and habit.we can not work without computer and our private moblephone.because all the office work such as printing some information and communicating with the customer is simply to complete.if we had not the technology we could not do this .
in my opinion that electronic product change our life .it makes our life more convenience  and us more closed.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 6086939a-6a4a-3141-93eb-fb8c33d53043> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of our society,there are more and more digital productions around us.We can see them at home,in school,in the street and so on.In a word,as soon as we open our eyes,we can find the digital productions beside us.
The main reason that the digital productions can be so popular is that it make our life easier.For example,we can get the news from the TV.When we feel homeless,we needn't write to our parents,but we only need to make a call by phone.We can listen the music whenever and wherever,because of the the MP3. In the domitory,computers become our bestfriends.So digital productions make our life full and easy.
And in my personal opinion,though the life become easy in the digital age,we don't keep happy all the time.The digital products may make us lazier and take us so much time.I find more and more children play computer games at weekends which is not a good childhood.They will lose the chance to be closed to the nature.And it is hard for our eyes.
All in all,maybe the digital age is good for our life,but it may be hard for our health.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID e6774c43-818d-3875-9d52-f164bcab9597> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Now,we can find many digital produces in our
life.
The digital produces make great difference in our life.For example,the mobile phones and computes are important to us in our life.They can help us link with our friends,gain the knoeledge we need form the Internet,and help us take it easy from reading or listening music or seeing some films,and so on.
In my opinion,there are some good or bad to us in the digital produces.In my life,some students' most important things are palying games so that they spend little time to student.And some students spend more time to gain the knoeledge they need so that they succed in their life.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 9d629005-9857-31a0-b7be-3daf8c10a648> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the developing of the science ,more and more digital products are coming to our life.Just like mobile phone ,pad ,PSP and so on.They play a major part in this consuming age.
The digital products make a profound effect on our daily life. They have brough us much more convenience and entertainment.We can send and check  emails on a handle pad ,and we can surf on the internet and see a movie either.With a intelegent iphone,we can lisen to popular songs while we are scaning our microblog on it .People make full use of their trival time with a digital product in hand .
From my point of view ,we can't get too attach to the digital products.First of all ,they may do a damage to our health if we play them for a long time.Moreover, it is somehow a waste of money beacause someone may even don't have a comment.We should keep an eye on the digital consuming.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 339268a0-643b-306d-98ac-d53630f1f933> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, with the strongly development of technology, more and more digital products are playing important roles in our modern lives.
As we all can see, digital products almost change our lives completely in many different ways. With the great help of them, we human beings can not only live longer , but we can live more conveniently and better.
As for me , i claim that digital products are of great help and use. We can travel all over the world as we staying at our home through them. We can connect each other as long as we get a digital product on our hands. But each coin has 2 sides. There is some other bad guys who always break the rules and lawys to satisfy themselves by using digital products. Their behaviors are mean and awful. Those things can not be stopped.
Any way, I still argue that digital products are good stuffs. Believe it or not,I am greatly convinced that we can creat a healthy and friendly society as long as we behave well by using digital products.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 0642d7e6-150e-35a4-bece-ae63a2d6155d> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
nowadays,there are more and more productions of digital in our life.All kinds of PDA such as IPad,IPhone, have bacome our fasion all over the world.
Abosulutetly,invation of digital prodution give us much fun,convenience. You can take a  PDA which intain work report can record information instead of many books and notes. Take  cellphone for example, the form cellphone only can be used take phone and send message, but now , all most cellphone can surf internet , play game,sell E-mail and so on.it have many Application as same as PC,unless you can take you PC outside  all the time .That's why the PC can't be fatasticed. Just as the coin has two side,more and more the production appear out life also bring many some problem . The most force of hypopsia of kinds is saty with the  digital element. Many students always use the cellphone under the dask on class.
As an computer Science student, Many we will devote oursevef in that field. OF course , I suppost the The Digital Age. Use that in correct way , we can

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 5753bf49-089d-3569-ac12-0f3cfaec4fc9> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, we are facing a wonderful and electrical age that more and more digital products are coming into our eyes. As we all know, the digital products have made a so important role in our daily life and we can't live without them.
Every coins have two side. On one hand, we are enjoying the benefit of electronics on communication, work, entertainment, study and so on, so we call it’s a digital age. We can’t image so a wonderful life in the eye of ancestor. Now we just through the mobile that we can talk to friends even thousands miles away. Our life turns so convenient and suitable. But on the other hand, Privacy has become increasingly fragile in a world of digital age. In many places, the electronics is monitoring our behavior . We always take the new technology for granted quickly, and we are losing our communication from eye to eye , as a result, the relationship between human is turning to worse. The digital age has no correlation between happiness and electronics.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 0473155d-6b45-37ec-b3e4-f0a3a672015e> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, it is a Digital Age, in our daily life, we can fang that there are lots of electronic product, which play a impertent role in our life .
As the development of science and technology, more znd more electronic products were producted. For example, air conditioning, which is a very  confortable for everyone, can make people feel better everywhere whenever summer or winter. It can not deny the fact that those products make a great different in our daily life.
In my opinion ,electronic products make our life more confortable and now we can not whitout them.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 04bcc439-ac46-3d97-8f52-d2b0fe95de07> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we can see more and more advent eletronic come to our life.Such as MP3,mp4,PC and so on.Sometimes they realy improve our life quality, but sometimes,they realy good to us?
It is difficult for us communication when wo are not in the same place.But telephone change it.It take so many conveniences to our life that we can take,wo can transfer information anytime,anywhere.As same as computure,we can use it to gain the information we need,watch news of anywhere of the world. What's,more some automates systens improve the process of product.They realy make our life become more and more sofe.
But, at the same time ,when we are amazed at the technology of today,we must think that they realy make our life more happiness? They don't. They make our distance of heart become far away.They make us far away nature,and just stay at home watch TV.
So we need wo go out to feel the nature.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID de89a86f-102a-33be-8590-6961391d4fec> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the digital technology progress,there are in mount of digital products nowadays.The digital products influent our daily life.
The digital products make great effort on many people's daily life on many sides.Many people hold the ideas that the digital products can make our work and life more convenient directly.Contradictory,there a few of people hold the opposite opinion that the digital products may have bad effect on our life,it may change our daily life in some extent and they can't adapt it.
Certainly,the digital product can make our society more colorful.The people who cant't accept it must attempt to adapt it,because the things will change into more simple and suitable in the digical age.The digital age will become the mainstream in our life.We shoule learn more about the digital technology and study to how to control them.If we learn more about the digital,we will get more knowledge in the digital age.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 3b70ff12-569a-3ff4-a6ae-a0de9c041912> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays digital products become more and more popular.Everyone has a digital camera,a phone or a computer.People want to catch a moment they want by camera or their phone.And then put it to the Internet to share with their friends.
The digital products make a huge diffrence on our daily life.People work at a computer desk.They finish their work just by a computer.If you want to know what time is it,you can look a digital clock or just look your phone that you take all the time.But every coin has two sides,digital product makes our life become convenience,also makes our life worse.Many porson use the digital products to do something harmful to our sociaty.The criminer use the digital products to get away from the law.And many porson play computer games every day and night.Always poeple says someone has dead because of play computer games.
On my opinion,we should not always use the diginal products.Ww only use it to convinience our life.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 2db3d8ca-f38b-3e4a-a9ca-70f3ec4f10a5> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,more and more electronic products appear all aroundus such as mobile phone and computers.
As we know the electrical productio make a big influence in our life.For example,we can talk to each other by mobile phone.And we surf the internet or go shopping,have a chat with friends.we should still learn how to buy things in the real world before.But now,we just need to open the webside and click the mouse.    So,we can found that we can do many things easily by the electronic products.
In my opinion,digital products both have advantage and disvantage.More electronic products make people lazier.And many peopel do not want to do things by themselves anymore.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID c746bb6a-7edc-3a26-8134-516da9524248> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
In today's world,more and more digital products have been produced ,humenbeing come into the digital age obviously.
Digital products mave make great differences with people's life.On the one hand,we can live more comfortable and convenient because of the digital products,such as,cars make us go everywhere easily,the internet take us into a new world fulls of interesting,such as iphone4s,ipad3.And the new medicines protest us from  illness and painess.
But on the other hand,Digital products take somethings unpleasant into our life as well.Somewhere appear acid rain just because of the productions of the digital products,the gas they let out,hurt the atmosphere deeply.Deforestation in big forests,is also a big question whice was caused by the production of digital products.
In a word,anything is contradictory,we produce the digital products should be careful our living atmosphere.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 840ff6d4-2c43-3e7f-89c5-06fed1a366aa> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Digital products updata as fast as speed of light,and more and more new digital product appear.As many people say,the digital age has come!
People creat so many wonderful digital products,at the same time,digital products change our life,also our life-style as far as possible.It's no doubt that people rely on digital products more than even so many passed years,because of the convenience the digital age brings us.For example,even 100 years ago,if you want to see your families or friends,you must come to the place where they are.But now,we just need to call the people up who we want  to see through video chat-room,and then we can see each other conveniently.As every one knows that the most popular thing is online shopping.yeah,we just need to move and click our mouse,then we can buy most of products online,and so on.
In my opinion,it's really the age of digital.We creat the digital products by the needs of us,at the same time,digital product change our lifestyle,too.However,we must realize that digital  product is just the tool that can make our life better,we shouldn't rely on it too much.It's the age of digital,but it's the age of human,too.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 1dad696a-9ae7-3928-8769-b69bf912614d> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,there are more and more electronic products in our life. We cound surf the Internet,watch TV and we use phone every time. Electronic products make oru life more convenient.
All we know,the elecronic products play a important parte in our life,and effert each side in our daily life. Now we are can not lived without elecronic products. Such as computer,it can make us closed to the world. If we have some questions,we can obains the answer from it. For instance, we can use MP3 or MP4 player to help us do some English listening task and enjoy ourselves in English songs. What's more, we can have fun with our mobilephone when we work or study tired. Also,with a digital camera, we can take pictures of every memorable moment or use a camera to record it. So,the digital products make a great influence in many ways in our daily lives.
In my opinion,digital products are great inventions of human being. Digital products let our lives more and more convinience. But sometimes,it has bad influence for us. Such as telemarketing,traffic jams and so on. Therefore,we should avoid it that makes bad influence to us. Let the digital products make our beautiful lives.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 279a9369-7911-3e91-b0e1-a05ea667f4d4> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of technology,more and more digital products coming into use,such as computer,cell phone,digital TV and so on,so we say that we are entering the digital age.
Great change have taken place in our life because of the digital products.For example,
we have computers to process documents at office,we can go shopping online instead of going
to shopping centre,we watch digital TV at home,and we can listen to MP3 player when we are traveling on buses or trains.It seems whatever we do we use one digital product or another.
Digital products have fundamentally transformed our way of work,education and life.
in my opinion,it is hard to imagine a life without digital products now.we can listen to
the radio and music on our way,chat with friend online through chatting software,so digital products have altered our daily life entirely.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 0657393c-f7a8-3bb9-8110-58285df6e54a> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadys the number of digital products is increasing so rapidly that a child who doesn't go to the school could take a mp3 or mp4 with him.
In fact,the digital product have a great effect in every area of our daily life.For example,when we buy something,we can use the credit cards to pay for it.Also,no one can avoid using our computers when we are at work.What's more,when we study English,the radio should turn up at the same time.In a word,the increasingly use of digital product make our life convenient and colourful.
In my opinion,the digital product does improve the quality of our life.we can see a economic boom around the world after the appearence of computers.And owing to the digital products,we can
achieve something unimaginable before,such as going to the space and so on.So, it is a truth that
digital products help us live in a special life.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID b4085a29-a02f-3808-9f43-d0a67a2b0d8e> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the development of technology grow faster and fast nowadays,digital products become courful and kindful.That is to say,all of us live in a digital age.
Digital products change people's life greately in all direction.Like communication,writing while is send by someone is out of fasion,if you want ,send a message or email just nend in a second or less.Space is not problem,as you like,you can see and talk to anyone no matter where he are. So digital products make our lives more convenient and courlorful.
Like the sayings "Everything has two faces",beside the advancement of digital products bring to us,the more we should think is the bad impat.It is not doubt that our lives become more convenient,but the same time,our lives steps become so fast that we are tired and have no time to
see around.Manny good things we share and are proud of in the past are forgetton as time go by.And many students are addicted to same games and so on.
So while we are using digital products,just take good use of it and try to advoid the bad influence.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 2d6b2b2e-84d8-38a5-81b1-a5e2008a42c0> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays an increasing number of electronic products come into our daily lifves .
Since electronic products play an more and more important part in our life and  make an great affect on public life, they have become indispensable .We can find that we can’t live without electronic products .A lot of people says that they must have their cellphone on all the time whenever and wherever .We can’t deny the benefice brought by products and they make our life more convenient and more comfortable .However ,they also bring much negative influence on our lives .One of the negative influences is that many students addicted to electronic products and depend on they excessively ,which  have affect their studies and decrease their own ability .
As far as I am concerned ,we are suppose to take advantage of electronic products in correct ways .

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 442e241b-beda-308f-88ac-532c1fc8fa07> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
After humen being entered the imformational and technological century,more and more
electric products filled with our lives.For example,in the past,when we wanted to cook rice,we needed to fire the wood.But today,what we only need to do is to press the bottom on the electric cooker.
The electric products impact our dailylife in every aspect.On the one hand,these electric products bring us convenience so that wo can save time to focus other important things.People can do shopping during the Internet at home rather than go to the supermarket.People also use some special equipments to help with the housework.On the other hand,these electric products may do harm to people or make prople lazy.Sometimes we can hear that someone was hurt by the electric products because of the wrong usage.Maybe one day we lack of eletricity,we don't how to spend our lives.
As far as I am concerned,in order to make electric products serve better to human being,we must regard them as tools but not depend on them.For instance,we need to learn how to cook by nature while we still have a electric cooker at home.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID db4bd47d-9c5a-3fae-a776-3cfd73e38deb> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, there are many digital things in our surroundings.Like:DVD,computer,
mircrophone,mircrowave,mobile phone,and so on.
This digital things make a big difference to our daily lifes. When we are tired,
we can listen to the music or watch TV from the DVD. When we want to find some             imformations, we can use the computer to  search from the Internet. When we want to call
someone between a long distance ways, we can use the mobilephone. When we want to know
know the time, we can watch the watch . These examples are many.
On my opinion, the digital things is very good to us. With its develop,  our life
is more beautiful, more colorful, more convenient, more happy.  So, we shoud learn to use
the different kinds of the digitals things to help us in dailylife.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 1130481d-5d76-3af6-bf35-57f5cf8661f7> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, a growing nunber of digital product are created in our modern society , witch has caused a great influence on every aspect of people's live.
THere is on doubt that the digital age has chenge many people's life style . On one hand , the digital product make it convinent for people to conmunicate with each other , such as the discover of tellphone and computer . It also make the word like a home that every people can talk with each other by the modern digital products .On the other hand , well goes an old saying "Just like a coin has tow sides ", the digital product also comes to many bad efforts. For example , privacy has becom increasingly fragile in a world of linked databases. Many people are addicted to the digital products and waste of their many time.
Form my point of view , I firmly agree with that digital products have more advantage than it's disadvantage. As for me ,we must use  digital products in an appropriate ways . If we want to study ,we must keep away from the digital products in order to focusing attention to learn what we want to learn .

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 93b2a88d-79a4-3f5d-a61e-5490318d4cf6> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays , as the technology developed , the number of electric productions is increasing fast . It is no doubt that those electric equipments has offered human a lot of convenience , and  they are taking an important part in human life .
It is the electric equipment that enable human to watch a living football game on TV even they are juat stay at home ，and without those production ，we are unable to travel another country that is far far away from us  in a few hours or talking to our friends immediately even they don't near us .
In my opinion , those electric equipment does more good than harm for human . Although they might easily harm our eyesight ，such as TV and computer . But it is the electric production that save human's time on many things , and provide human more choise to do one thing , which helps human to finish it more reasonable and efficient . Last but not least ,
since people nowadays cannot quit the electric production , every one should learn to fit in
a real digital age .

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 8da90e6c-33a6-37ac-a592-6d2288e50d18> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know more and more electronic products in our life ,for example:computers, mobile phones, TV and so on,in some of these things is that we cannot live without;it is very important in our life,so the electronic products to the people all aspects of life has very big effect.for example ,the computers,now more and more people use it to work,cannot leave it.the mobole phones,it i also very inportant in our life,we can't imagine no mobile phone world is what kind of,and so on.these things become a part of our life ,we really can not  leave it.
Everything has two sides, and everyone for different things have a different opinion,electronic products is no exception,some people think that it is good, some people think that it is not good
,in my opinion, the electronic products to our life bring very much change, and gradually change our lives,but it also bring us many bad things, such as pollution,and bring many problem to people,so we want to look at it the ideal,

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 3caaabd3-2f1d-30ab-aad4-2a2659a417cf> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Today,in our modern society,digital poducts are more and more important in our daily life which we can see evevrywhere anytime and are producted more and more.
Digital products come out in our daily necessaries which have agreat impacts on our life.For example ,the mobile phone ,one of the digitle products,is the important sign
which we take every day wherever we go make great influence to mankind.If without it ,
we  can not communicate with others who are far from us .TV,which we take it for grant,
is an another great digital product in our life.Everytime,when we want to relaxt,it may
be the first choise for you.It vise people's view and help people to get a lot of maniges
without get out of home.Digital products' influence are not only in our daily life,but also in other places,like economic and policy and so on.They have been made to be many kinds,such
as computer,telephone,digital clock...They don't exit nowhere and take us to the digital age.
As far as I'm concented,digital products are convenient for our life ,with being good for our country's development.We can imagine how our lives will be without digital products.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID a78c4f1a-d775-3502-8325-01f5c50bba54> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,there are more and more digital products in our life,such as digital camera,MP3,computer and so on.So,there is no doubt that all of this digital products have great influences on us,both good and bad.
For example,with computer,we can not only listen to the music or play computer games to relax oueselves after our work,but to have a chat with our friends,who are distant from us.Moreover,we can use Internet to search lots of knowledges and learn more after class.However,computer games can also do harm to our study and work if we indulge in it.
Therefore,as to digital products,though there are more and more around us,which is really attraction to us.I hope that people can control themselves not be addicted to them but use tnem properly to make our life better.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 30c19270-a3c1-36cd-b201-74bd9950b90c> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
In the rapidly changing technology, our lives have been inseparable from digital products! And the product updates so fast that make us surprised, the function of a variety of digital products, let us lament the scientific and technological omnipotence. We have entered the digital age.
digital products on our lives to change Just think if we do not have a cell phone, no computer , life is obviously not conceivable. We have to use the phone with others, we use a computer to understand each kind of information , not to mention other digital products to our lives convenient.
Of course,in my idear, I feel that anything has two sides. As a consumer of digital products, I must admit I have been inseparable from them. I believe that many people at my side, all the time holding a cell phone, play games, Internet. This other things away from our line of sight, when the party,when in class, everyone playing with their phones.  I think this is fatal, digital products, we become not need to communicate with others, to become not need to reach out to other things.
So, I think sometimes digital products has brought us many benefits, but if we transition to abuse, then it will also bring drawbacks.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID ff85ff31-9d15-34f2-843e-cfcdf5834a7f> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Eveyday we work in our computer,talk with our friend in our iphone,use camera to mark down the wonderful time in our life.It's sure that more and more digital products appear in our life.
Why there are so many digital products in our life?The reason is that they make our life more convinient and colorful.We can talk with our parents even if we are far from home.We can play game in our ipad,which make our daily life more interesting.They just like the magic that give us a more comfortable life.
It's no doubt that digital products are good for our life.But it can also make bad effect.Some teenagers become crazy fans of Apple's product.In order to buy the newest ipad,they even stloe money or hurt themself to get money. Some sutdents rely too much on digital product that they can hardly live without them.
So,if we rely too much on them or are too crazy about the fashional product,i just make our life out of controll.Digital product just a kind of tool in our life,we should choose useful one but not fashional one.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 76afda16-e249-358e-b7f4-6b830e38ae15> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowaday,electronic products have become universal necessity for human  being.Apart from this,more and more new electronic products was producted.There is no doubt that all those hight-tech products make our life in great different in many places.
Manybe many people think highly of them.Because in this digital age ,we can keep touch with others by using mobile phone,computer and so on.we save a lot of time.Or we can play games,watch TV ,ect.Makeing fun just not only a outwork.
Surely,electronic products make our life more and more easily.However,we must know that each coins has two side.
First of all ,it take us too much money to buy ones.And most of us can hardly provide.What's more,many people addictted in it.As a result,their study become worse and worse and they will be looked down upon by their classmates,lossing their hearts.Last but not least,it will make our love become lightly.
In our daily life,we must keep a clear mind in using those electronic products.So we can make great use of them.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 60fa44b0-b940-3c24-a43f-4215a9254798> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowdays the digital products is boomig in our life, more and more cellpones  computer  and so on,they have many differet kinds.so we always have good choice when we want to buy one.
The most important things is the Digital products have made our life in differet badly.It is doing now. For example,we can't keep in touch with our friends in the past.But today we can,because we have a cellpone.none of us can not have a cellpone ,it is in everyone's life. In the past we don't have a computer,a lot of things is very hard for our human beings.But when we have a computer we can do many things by it.It have helped man do many thigs.Not only in our dialy life but also in the work.It is really  great.There are many other digital product ,they all have a  great infulence on our life.
In my opinion digital products have became a part of our life.We all need them.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID acfec863-6f62-38fe-9653-014c91450539> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,as the technology evelop,more and more digital products have come along our life.
Digital products influence our life in many different ways.Like digital camera,it only need electriity but not films,it's cost is cheaper and convenient.It can record our daily or event with a picture.Cellphone,make our life more convenient,no matter where you are,as you have a cellphone,then I can find you locate,tell you the information that I want to tell you at once.Computer,the king of the digital proucts.The computer has many funtions,like counting,deal with pictuers,and so on...It make our work and life more efficiency.
I think digital products make our life happier and convenient.I can not imagime the life without them!

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 1a096eb4-95ba-331f-8d0f-8931119df006> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the society develop,there are more and more digital productions arounds us.Many place s such as home,school,hotel and so on,all have their figures.It is clear that they are the improtant pole of our life.
The main reason that the digital productions can be so popular is that it make the life become more advantageous.for instance,the mp3 just has a little body but can lay in thousand of songs. we can listen it all the time and all the place.beside that,now more and more bus use the electricity.the great means is that we can live on the "green" way .the earth will be more healthy.
In a word,electric productions are  great invetions.beause of them ,life will be more simple!!!

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID a9e82a7f-68f6-3a55-bcfa-9b653d21712b> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the development of technology, digital products are now going into thousands of millions of people's life,  For example,  many people now have their computer, smart phone(android/iOS), tablet computer, camera, and so on.
Undoubtly, these digital products make our life more convenient. People can easily use their phone to have a face to face talk, which make a talk more like a turely conversation. Of course people can surfing in the web for messages, shopping. In the same way, these digital product also cost many problems. Because it cost people so much time with it.
I don't have so many digital products, so I don't really feel the impact of the digital age.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 89e39c19-9618-36a8-90ee-f7e1eefb6caf> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,more and more electonic products are being used .They play an important role in our life.
As the technology improving,electonic products become more and more useful and convinient.We can use them to search the imformation such as using computer or phone to surfing.What's more,we can use them to listening songs or watching a movie to relax ourseles.Also, we can use them to help our study and so on.
Electonic products become smarter and smarter today,they help human-being a lot and make a difference in our life.In my view,though electonic products play an important role in our life,we can't rely on them.We should make good use of them rather than being control by them.To have a convinient life,make good use of the electonic products around us.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID a1290583-3127-3fe1-adc1-4cbaeec5143b> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, with the development of information technology, there is a growing number of people use digital products. Just like the digital cameras, MP3 players, computers and so on.
There is no doubt that digital products play an important role in our daily life. For example, on the one hand, we can work with computer which make our works more convenient and effective. On the other hand, as for students, these digital products help a lot in our studies. For instance, we can use MP3 or MP4 player to help us do some english listening task. What's more, we can have fun with our mobilephone when we work or study tired. In the way of entertainment, we can take pictures of every memorable moment whit the digital camera too.
Our society has entered a digital age. I believe more digital products will be created in the future. In a word, digital products benefit us a lot, which make our life more colorful.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 21906544-c99f-31f8-b52d-ee4eaa2a167f> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,there are more and more electronic products apprea in the market with the development of science and technology.what is important  is people's life level have improved so that people have money to consume in .Thus,we go into The Digital Age.
Specially in later years,one of the electronic products-mobile phone,are developed rapidly.Like iphone htc samsung,these smartphone have maken a big difference in human life.Calling and texting are not the only  way for human to contact with each other.What people most like is using mobilephone to take pictures and share it with friends on the internet.Electronic products have a remarkable affect in every aspect in human life,making more easily for human to cummunicate with eacg other.
In my opinion,the apprea of electronic products bringing more benefits in our life.Computer products help us do things become esaily,it is mobile phone that make our life more colourful and varied,the high quality music products can let human enjoy beautiful music and relax themself.It is nodoubt that electronic products are well benefical with human.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID 86b46fa5-69d3-30b3-b000-ae2ed36b9896> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Today we are living in the digital age which
more and more  digital products come into our
live.
The digital products has infaced in our live
in many areas,in other word,the digital producta
has became a part of our livehood.The computer,
the printer,the fax,the mobilphone is the important
assisters in our work,while our family cannot without
the TV.What's more we would be not feel comfortable
if we lost the cell phone or MP4.There is not doubt
that the digital products make our woke more easy
and fast,make our live more colourful.
In my oponion,we are living in the intrested world
because of the digital age coming.We can contoral
the digital products to help us working and enjoy
in them.We should belive that the digital products
can become our best assister in our work and our
good friends in our livehood.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID dcc499f8-eacc-3f04-acda-390f7e022d16> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Today, more and more electronic products appear all aroundus,such as computer, refrigerators, fans, washing machines,as so on.They make our lives a big change.
Electronic products have had a great impact in all aspects of people's lives.That have good but aiso bad.It is no doubt that Electronic products take us convenience and make our life more wonderful and color.But in other hand,the digital age also give us painc.Secret no longer be secret.We know many about others and others know us.We feel afraid.This is not a happy thing.
In my opinion,the development of Electronic products is important for the human being.
Though it is so universal.But it make us progress.

<TITLE The Digital Age> <ESSAYID eb2aafeb-ca28-37ed-afa4-577359e8035c> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know ,more and more digital products have been used in our daily life.With the help of them,our life are becoming more and more colourful and interesting.
There is no doubt that digital products make a great difference on all parts of our life.First of all,computer makes it easier for us to kown the outside world and makes our life relaxed.As a result of telephone,we can contact with our friends and relatives who are far away from us and keep our friendship.what is more,the appearence of TV helps us kown what is happening around us and so on.
Form my point of view,digital products both have advantage and disvantage.For one part,they do develop our society and the quality of our life,for another,they make people lazier.If we can make good use of digital products ,it will help us a lot in our daily life.



